They should add that to the instructions on the box :p
Beta has nothing to do with lack of muscles.  It has everything to do with an inability to lead and assert yourself peacefully but firmly in the relationship.
&gt;Actually perhaps he was talking about a completely different god altogether. Perhaps the old testament god did create another god who promptly destroyed the old one for being a bit of a selfish and evil bastard. Perhaps the new testament god who Jesus says is his father is this new god. That would explain a lot.  Perhaps you are familiar with the original Christianity,  [Marcionism](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marcionism).  The Christian adversary Celsus, who debated with Origen, understood “Christians” to mean primarily Marcionite Christians—which permits a significant inference about the spread of Marcionism at this time. (Tertullian, AM 5.19; Justin, Apol., 1.58)
So many votes, and an almost even karma score!  To be fair to Firefly, it didn't get a full run the way mad men currently is.  Who knows -- maybe if it had aired on AMC instead of Fox things would have been very different.
Heee, I just imagined you getting all excited for a split second and then sighing deeply with despair.
I'm gonna study through all the contradictions and the hard parts where God orders people to commit genocide, rape and murder in his name. Mainly Deuteronomy, Leviticus and Joshua.  Fun times.
I love the idea. Google has never seemed to react to any of my submissions in the past, though.
&gt;turned out to be just as medicore of a game as was GTAIV.  So you have no idea what you're talking about?  Cool.
Upvoting because everyone should play this game!
I have the same resolution every year, none. If something needs to change in my life I don't wait until a new year, I start the change immediately.
I'm female. Ergo, the name "Helen". 
How would we define "fucking up your kid mentally"?  To those parents, allowing their child to listen to music or read a novel is irreparably harmful.  To us it's fantastic.  The worst part of freedom will always be having to accept that some people are going to say, do and believe incredibly stupid things and there is very, very little we can do to change that.  We can be ourselves, we can fight systemic and societal racism, homophobia, and misogyny, we can demand separation of church and state, and we can ensure that no one person's beliefs will in any way negatively affect our everyday lives.  Once that's been accomplished though (or if those concepts are moot, such as in this particular situation) then we have very little right to get involved with another person's life.  And I mentioned neglect, beating, and food not as things I disagree with (although I do) but rather as examples of ways in which overly religious parents can (and have) been abusive to their children.  My point was that if their personal belief system wasn't endangering the child, then we don't have much recourse to stop them from doing what they want.  I would also add "healing through prayer" to that list, though.  That is child abuse plain and simple.  
I'm black and I look at them like that too.
I kind of disagree with Nicoscope. You dress in what makes you feel comfortable, and y'know, that's cool. Your piercings are awesome, too, and your skin is gorgeous, and you have fine &amp; pleasing features. Good luck finding someone in 2011. :)
One benefit is it would stop the slippery slope to giving TSA goons power of arrest. You can flip off a mall cop.
If scoped correctly this issue would have been brought up and probably was. Given the size of the network and the number of people with access to the data I'm would not entirely surprised that the leaks happened in this way. Physical access is a very difficult beast to manage because you have to depend upon the people to enforce it.  It's usually only after such an incident happens and is broadcasted that actions happen because prior to that the risk vs. cost ratios were weighed and accepted. Hindsight is a bitch (and 20/20). 
The issue is that the statement "This guy has a lot of free time on his hands" is a weaselly attack on the creator. It's pretty much straight up mocking him for working hard on something, the same way others are attacked for studying to much, or practicing something too much.
Just ask me, I can give you some assignments.
I'd like to feed this kid to the rapists out there, take his money, then curb stomp him.
I would suggest checking your hard drive and checking your ram before you do the installation. It sounds weird that your recovery is not working.  Rolmos did a wonderful post showing how to do a clean install.
Look, I keep re-reading your post, and I'm trying to sympathize with you since I've been through some messy breakups before with long term girlfriends.  And I can't help but think this is for the best, and living together just made it clear that she needs to leave and you need to let her.  It's tough to justify blaming your girlfriend for ruining your night because she's in tears, or blaming her low-self esteem for negatively affecting you, or drinking all night till morning and drunkenly kicking her out, or following her with a camera drunkenly accusing her of wanting to steal your stuff.  Honestly, you sound you've been a huge asshole to her and you need to stop.  There's no justification for it.  You need to apologize for being an asshole and take a step back and take your hands off the situation. I know you want to make things right, and the best thing you can do is keep a distance, let her do what she needs to do, and stop making things worse. Once this is over, you really need to consider whether you really want to make things better because what you're doing isn't working.
You are correct, Tomme Arthur founded Pizza Port in Solana Beach and then expanded to Carlsbad.  He then left and started The Lost Abbey/ Port Brewing. Now Jeff Bagby is head brewer at Carlsbad and oversees brewery operations at all of the pizza ports.  Each location, however, has its own head brewer and they submit to competitions separately. The Port "umbrella" has probably the best collection of brewers, dare I say, in the world.
Oh wait I've got this... Pretty Scientist I'd Learn From
Dude, don't screw the filmmakers out of tons of money here. You would be hurting the movie, and ruining its future. Instead, you should try and get in contact with the filmmakers. Email the director, etc. Once you know for sure the movie isn't coming out, THEN you upload it.
Why does he start playing air guitar @ 2:40...
Once you start debating about animal rights, that kind of thinking could be easily considered as discriminating.
So why is that an excuse? MLK is on the same level as Gandhi. 
Ive seen better but this is still pretty good
Same here! I don't get cold in a skirt. 
The thing with the Locker call was, he threw the ball up in the air after the TD.  This was the first game of the season and they had made the rule over the previous offseason that throwing the ball would be a penalty.  It was a clear case of the refs making an example, but it was also the correct call, going strictly by the books.  Also, they still should have been able to kick the extra point, should have been easy even.  If UW had even an average kicker that year they would have won 2-3 games.
In a way, I'm happy people still give them away. There's still some innocence when jerkoffs like this guy exist.
This sounds good on both guitar on the Ukulele:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=puSkP3uym5k
Henry Rollins is still one of my favorite people of all time
Ravel's String Quartet and Piano Trio are awesome. Debussy wrote a ton of lovely piano preludes. You might also want to look into Gabriel Fauré, Erik Satie, and ["les six"](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Les_six). 
Um.  What?
Your friends dad is a racist pretending to be hy-larious.  He's also a bit of an asshole, that much time invested to try and mock somebody.
Say "No." when the girl who would ultimately take a piss on my bed asked if we could hang out and go on a date.
I've had success with Everlong by Foo Fighters, but maybe I'm strange
Maybe someone touched your genitals - Crotch Sanitizer
I'm in 97214. 
who isn't?
Should have picked up an SBR and Can Stamps for it while he was at it...lol
Damn. I'm obligated to go out to dinner tomorrow night.
It's like a Koala crapped a rainbow in my brain!
Stories like this give me hope for a brighter future for man.
1920x1200 at least.  2560x1600 if lucky.
Double edged sword perhaps. They massively oversell their bandwidth and pocket all profit rather than reinvest, only able to do so as government/crtc allows them throttling on a "management" basis. In my area the network has been vastly upgraded recently, my old once "unlimited" connection, gets less bandwidth than ever. By I can order an upgrade 4X as fast. Oh and the faster you go, the smaller your cap. If you order their ultimate speed package and go over just 100gb/month it's 10 bucks a gig!
That is the  nature of the beast. In any job you typically don't get extra notice for doing your job correctly but if you fuck something up you lots of extra attention. 
You strawmanned me yet again. You can't actually mount an attack against me, because your position is lacking in substance. You are a paper tiger.
I remember having an archon with something like 140 kills :D  I think it was 2 dts, one with around 80 kills and the other 60.
This has to be the most talking he does in a skit.
I didn't know if it had already been part of a daily deal and it was already on sale down from 20. I got it at a good price, but in the future I just won't buy anything that's not a daily deal.
I take it as a suggestion to be a badass and get shit done. It's not saying "be more of an alpha douche", it's saying "look what needs to happen, don't make excuses, do it."  People definitely take it the wrong way, but when they realize what attitude to take in order to be successful in these types of things, they will understand the beauty of Man up.
That sucks.   I remember those days.
Let her know its their fault Jett Travolta died. R.I.P
Go on...
I am a fan of it :)
Done!
"Bottlenose dolphins could recognise themselves in a mirror and use it to inspect various parts of their bodies, an ability that had been thought limited to humans and great apes."   Self awareness has also been noted in elephants who have used mirrors to inspect the inside of their mouths and to rub at chalk marks that researchers placed on their heads.  http://www.nsta.org/publications/news/story.aspx?id=52992
Austria too and don't forget the fucking Zinn gießen
They did for the 3ds
Eno used FM synthesis for the most part.  The sine waves in this application seem more indicative of subtractive synthesis.  
Looks like it, judging from that cylindrical staircase in the background.
Jennifer Government. I mean, I didn't read any of your list, but you should ABC: Always BeBuying Jennifer Government.
**AMMMMERRRRIIICCAAAAA!!!!!**
I actually applied for a couple jobs there, but I didn't hear back from them. I'm going to call them anyway next week.
"Redditors declare igg14 to be a super genius"
Hooray for Hard Eight!
Brave New World was a better read in my opinion. Maybe not as foreshadowing about the future of our society but Aldous Huxley was a better writer.
It's goddamn amateur hour up in here already?
No doubt, good band, good guys. Same to you.
IMO, that comic's really started to go downhill as of late.
GET FF7 !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
What were you expecting when you clicked on a self.trees post with the title I chose? A witty one-liner?
Hmmm...  http://www.reddit.com/r/gaming/comments/erv1j/alright_rgaming_i_am_giving_away_1_steam_game_of/c1afowu  http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/erhje/help_a_young_boy_on_these_last_hours_of_christmas/  Make up your mind.
Because this reddit is filled with wanna be, hipster, metalheads.  Suck it, assholes.
From someone who works in Customer Service and have been for over 5 years, this was NOT professional, nor did the agent express **ANY** desire to assist the customer. All they did was contradict themselves, THEN tries to deny it...
She wrote F4U11. [](/omg "'nuff said. ")
Wow, that seems like a good idea. I work full time, so it may not work in the area I live in. Virginia Tech is a short drive away, I will have to check with them about a post-ba pre-opt/med program. (still not sure which route I am going). I'd likely have to quit and go to school full time, but it would put me into a lot of debt prior to even starting professional school. You said they offer financial aid, you mean loans though right? I really don't want to finish all this with $300,000 in debt that'll take me 20 years to pay off, lol.  I'll check with VT, I hadn't even thought about that, thanks!
Far Cry Bundle! D:   https://steamcommunity.com/id/zeldrick
No offense meant. I just don't want anybody getting the wrong idea and acting on it. I preach knowing your local laws pretty heavily.
Oh shut up!  How else can we protect ourselves from terrorists?
MEGUSTA
I see the ISP's brainwash campaign has worked well on you.  Even though 820+gb a month seems super excessive so what its not like its Water or Electricity.   There will be more bw tomorrow dont worry. 
The system is the system of double-blind, placebo controlled trials which begin with animals and progress to humans. It is the only way to accurately measure positive and negative effects, and provides the most protection to human test subjects.  Would you care to suggest a better system?
Confirming! Drorgen!
Remember that Alpha is not about being an SOB.  SOB usually *looks* like Alpha, but it isn't... SOB is just being an asshole.
Eight hours til NYE here. Have a good 2011.
Someone has already explained what to do next in this particular situation, but the general rule of thumb is: go to the nearest town and talk to random NPCs. They almost always tell you what you're supposed to be doing.  If they say "hey, I saw some point-hats coming from the forest to the south", then go to the forest to the south. Etc.
Matthew 5:17
wow, what a beautiful way to waste some time
Why would you feel you need to apologize for your medical condition?  If I were your friend your apology would make me feel uncomfortable.
I'm diabetic myself,I know what can happen.Cops are PIGS, pure and simple.They have been pigs ,will be pigs and will continue to do this in the future.He is lucky he didn't get shot ala Seattle!
Because horny guys will click on *anything* that looks like a pussy :/
Psh...cheater.
YOUR FACE
Yeah...unfortunately as I soon as I saw BotS IV, I knew it couldn't be real...as happy as the thought makes me. T_T
Instead of getting smashed and driving outside, just lurk /r/cripplingalcoholism (:
There was one kid who was 17 and ready to celebrate his 18th birthday. His mother was a crackhead in Ohio and his dad had already OD'd. He stayed with his grandfather who hated him and the grandfather's girlfriend. He was into MMA and had already had 3 amateur fights and he was incredibly violent. The reason he got sent to the school in the first place was because he put a kid in a coma because he was hitting on his girlfriend.  Anyways, the kid's grandfather told him that the day he turns 18, he's kicking him out. The kid had plans to join the army but couldn't go because he couldn't pass the entrance exam. He told us all that the day he turns 18, he'll probably be on the news because he's going to try to go to jail since he'll have no where else to live. Sure enough, he was caught hitting the side of a cop car with a baseball bat that day. 
lol a store called giant tiger  their playboy brand 
He is so easy to become obsessed with. I'm right with you there.  
*  The Empty Child/THe Doctor Dances *  Father's Day * Blink * The Lodger * Midnight  I feel like there are so many more to add to this list.  It was very difficult to choose these.
So, since the land within the borders of Texas is also located in Texas, I can assume you also ignore that too?  You really let the idea you have of people ruin an entire state for you?  People who say what you do have no idea how much better the rest of the state is compared to your opinion.  The people throughout Texas are far more kind to strangers than you think, even if you are someone who looks strange.  Seeing the *entire rest of the state* through a political lense doesn't make you sound too sharp.  I'm not exactly liberal or conservative, strictly speaking.  I prefer to think for myself.  I've found just as much intolerance among liberals as I have among conservatives, and, when people here in Austin consign the rest of the state to some sort of heap of irrelevance because it's not what they want it to be, it's the same as the conservatives who actively maintain narrow-minded opinions.  You are no different.  Having actually grown up in and traveled throughout other parts of the state, and lived in most of the major cities, I can safely say your opinion is based on some truly flimsy thinking.  Even when I was a punk rock kid wearing chains in my younger days, the friendliest people I remember meeting were rarely in Dallas, San Antonio, or Austin.  I've met as many douchebags in Dallas and Austin as I have throughout the rest of the state.  Don't be afraid.  There are some very conservative people in the middle of nowhere in this state who would treat you pretty much like family just because you all crossed paths.  That's not political action.  It's just simple decency and kindness.  There's nothing quite like meeting people of all kinds, many of whom are quite different from ourselves, but who also do not emotionally or willfully make themselves think of us strictly as political entities, but instead simply think of us as people.  Nobody is perfect, of course, but you would be surprised how often you would find such people in places you would not expect it.  That said, aside from people, you should think of the land and go see things like the Palo Duro Canyon, and, closer to here, Enchanted Rock.  
everyone should realise that Kirby is an Eldritch Abomination and that the games are just you seeing through his eyes.
let me guess: porn, hd x264 flicks, and uploads. 
Aroojiabrau! Shakey breaky!
My girlfriend loves playing Little Big Planet with me, it really is a great game for that. She also professes to hate "games with guns" and "games where you shoot people", but she will play Red Dead Redemption multi-player for 4 hours straight... If you can teach your GF how to use dead eye (bullet time), she might enjoy that,
Cache
Seriously? Just in case you're not trolling, it comes from the Sermon on the Mount. You can see it as metaphorical purely but the don't divorce reading is valid and difficult to refute.  I personally, for the record, have no problem with divorce. But it is ridiculous to suggest that the rule has no basis in the Bible.
I really enjoyed that series until the ending. **Possible Spoiler** I couldn't get over the use of a literal Dues Ex Machina after making it through almost 4000 pages. **End Spoiler**
Exactly, I didn't mean anything demeaning in regards to this intelligent young woman.
A more humorous approach (from the perspective of math proofs):  http://school.maths.uwa.edu.au/~berwin/humour/invalid.proofs.html
Did you make any significant diet changes?  Conventional wisdom on reddit is "you can't out-train your diet".  Did you out-train your diet?  Nice work!
Battlefield Earth
fuck that im gonna be smashed.
Because viruses are designed to generate money nowadays, and hey... you go where the eyeballs and clicks are.  Porno. 
I still have the entire last season of that on my DVR. It's so depressing, I have to watch HD stuff first because my DVR keeps filling up, but there is so much that I'll probably never watch it.
good to know man, sorry my intoxication got in the way of a connection with your words. Rectified, sir
Catholic Herald prints Vatican party line.
OK, what do the shortages tell you? As far as I can tell those shortages are temporary due to caravans, etc and don't really indicate what shop would be effective... also, what do the numbers next to the shortages indicate? 
because people are much more likely to click a sketchy link if it promises boobs.
I agree with everything zeppelinfromled said... except housing: as a former boston rental agent. i can say that for the most part 1100 is at the bottomn for a 1 bedroom, . can get a decent 1 bedroom (i.e. relatively decent) near davis sq in somerville or allston/brighton.   P.S. tire chains are illegal here in MA..
Protoss, Marines............................................................................
He is a Linux user who had his 15 minutes of fame by exposing Microsoft's lies in 2009. You can ask him anything.
Indeed -- standardized extracts are important... especially with compounds that have very narrow therapy-dosage margins. The best thing I imagine one could do in a pinch (survival) would be to try the smallest amount first, and slowly inch up dosage of plant matter until a therapeutic dosage is reached. That or make an aqueous extract or tincture, and evaporate the liquid "solvent" (water or ethanol) to leave the dry solids. Then just assume whatever is left is pure alkaloids (it probably won't be), and dose from there.
This is a less funny rip-off of Don Hertzfeld's work.
At that point in time, you had the army, and the ability to enact a militia.. effectively like a draft but generally used for local defense. So by owning a gun you were basically a militia to be called upon.  Most of the actual argument about it though centers around the "spirit" of the amendment from each of the ratifiers.. which of course I can't seem to find the exact wording or citation for at the moment. but effectively they revolved around "so that no unjust government shall rule" and the like.. sort of pointing to it being there for the protection of the people from the government.
I actually was part of the design team who made this. I strongly suggested simply removing the child from the design. It was unnecessary and could easily lead to pedo jokes on the internet. When I mentioned this I simply got a &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232; look.
Quit smoking, hit the gym 3+ times per week and be gainfully employed or back in school.
this happened to me quite recently, we got T-boned by a motorcyclist while I was in the passenger seat. I was pulling broken glass out of my face hours afterward. Nobody got hurt, although if my window had been open my face wouldn't have fared well.
wow i feel worthless by comparison. inspiration indeed.
**STOP RIGHT THERE CRIMINAL SCUM**
Fair enough.  If I had guns, which I don't, I would be inclined to be "looking" for those sorts of things you mentioned.  You know the old adage, when you've got a hammer, everything looks like a nail?
I'll see what I can find for you this evening (gotta finish some honeydos) and send you some links.   Full Disclosure: I have worked for the Salazars (Ken and John) and like them personally, we just don't always see eye to eye.
I use Winamp to sync my iPod. I've never installed iTunes :)
It's the build up that's the bad part. I went swimming in a glacier fed river this summer for the first time. You get in, submerge yourself, you get out. The cold water gets all your blood flowing and you end up weirdly warm as your body works overtime to compensate for this cold water that appeared out of nowhere.   Just make sure you have warm, dry clothes ready for you when you get out. 
Crashed stealth fighters do exist in the wild, and it's possible China got ahold of some of the radar absorbing material.
can you see the aeropostale display? a friend of mine helped work on the times square 120' LED thing.. 
And sometimes it's both on different levels!  Both of my Sausage McMuffins were delicious this morning, but I also feel much better about "dealing" with a small tv and such instead of splurging
Oh calm down.  I wasn't saying coke makes you trip like LSD or mushrooms; I was referring to the false sense of euphoria represented by the expressions on the characters' faces.  The contrast in colors and textures between what's going on in the mind and reality. What's your point?  You're better at drugs than other people?  Congrats.
Preferably a turtle.
I heard the Ministry of Magic is setting up checkpoints.
No Stasy it is not my bday. Honestly dude, we learned hearing is log based last year, why you gotta make a comment like that.
Yup. Los Angeles needs help. The biggest breweries here are Bruery (actually in Orange County) and Ladyface (actually in Ventura County). Maybe about 12 exceptional beer bars, about the same amount of liquor stores. Food is covered, but why is good booze such an adventure to find in such a big city?
Stalker bundle http://steamcommunity.com/id/cobolatrix
Request **anything** thats free. Even if you dont need it.
I loved this, my boyfriend and I laughed our asses off at the suspense music :)
One thing I have already noticed is that all the characters are **extremely** good looking, especially the main girl Lightning. However, that cannot cover up the fact that she is a huge ball of angsty bitchiness
none taken dood.
Wasn't the fee, but rather the response to comment. The words you choose were not conducive to proper business. It sounded like a teenager or early 20 something talking off the cuff not a professional marketing his business to potential clients. 
Last year I hit a new low. All I had was two strings of white lights, one along the roof eaves at the front, the other wrapped around the porch rail, both plugged into the porch light socket. I unplugged the eaves lights. Done.
I wonder if he feels the same about Palin killing Caribou.
Eyes lips face is found in most variety stores like Dollar General, but not usually their studio line which is what you want to get.  Can I ask where you live?  They also have a UK site if that helps.  Shipping should only be like 6 or 7 dollars in the US.
What.
&gt; Fractional reserve banking is fine if correct limits and regulations are in place.  Fractional reserve lending is unconstitutional, as it allows entities other than Congress to create money.
NO I DON'T NEED TO CRAWL YOU NEED TO CRAWL
a 2nd rate actor giving a speech about 2nd place lol  this is still just a speech to make common people feel better
Yes, exactly right. The actual grammar is unchanged. All operators have the same precedence, and associate left to right. The only difference is that `a + b - c` used to desugar to something like:   a.+(b).-(c)  and now it desugars to:   -(+(a, b), c)
shoulda bought him a 12 pack
Wow! UPVOTED!
Do you have friends? If any of my friends were in this situation, I wouldn't hesitate to take them in for a month. 
probation and lack of money...hate the holidays...my fault though
Do someone a favor...go out of your way.  Do not friend them on Facebook...that could ruin everything.
I want to get a perfect ass on for birthday :( I hope you put that to good use :D
It doesn't matter if it's offensive or not, moron.  How you personally feel about it is irrelevant to their freedoms. I just said that.  God you're dumb.
Because you eat shit from under your toenails.
11:59 pm - 12:01am Fap in the new year! [](/fap)
&gt;A bit less intense? This hardly touches the lack of intensity a condom brings  Just thought I'd throw in that as a guy, condom or no condom makes very little difference to me. I think the pause in action in getting/donning a condom is way worse than any loss in sensitivity.  Although I do believe I'm in the minority on this one.  I do think there is some self fulfilling prophecy with how much condoms are supposed to wreck the pleasure of sex. From how some of my friends talk, you'd think a condom was the equivalent of coating your dick in 3 inches of concrete.
Sounds like youre a perfect fit for a CC then. Some CCs have programs for pre-med type things which are backed by larger universities. I know the CC I went to had a med program that was considered UCLA Medical.
Here's some good advice: Never fart right before you sit down.
He seems to have a different meaning of 'proof' than I do.
Dominant cultures have always taken what they want from weaker cultures.   Why should we expect israel be to any different?   They wanted land and they took land. They then wanted more land and they took more land. Isn't that the way it has always been?? The only way to stop a dominant culture is to become more dominant -- then you can take back what you once had, but lost.   Why would one question Iran. It is clear that they wish to become more dominant so they can do what Israel is doing.   Don't you read history?
Alcohol on fire?
Link to 'Guns, Germs and Steel' documentary: http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=-4008293090480628280#
They get crafted into refined. Which then get upgraded to promo items/unusuals.
I never understood why it was going backwards
Nice try, Microsoft representative.
where do you live that you have to pay taxes to have a dog... thats lame!  my dog only has his name plate tag. has his name, my cell number, city state zip, and Reward if Found.  I dont like him running around jingling.
Also relevant: Uncharted 2 is Firefly.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7h1pirf1HLI  These tropes get repeated over and over and over.  Their appeal is near universal.
"Watching Funky Forest is like peeking inside the skull of an American schizophrenic﻿ stranded in Tokyo on a three day meth and mescaline binge, nodding off into dreams and blacking out in periodic epileptic fits as he flips through the local channels at 4:30 AM, all the while unaware that aliens are attempting to jam the local airwaves with subliminal propaganda designed to prepare us for an imminent encounter with advanced beings our brains are still eons away from being able to comprehend."   -I could not have said this any better.
He was bad ass at first, but what they did with him in the original Clone Wars cartoon was atrocious.
The general sentiment among Chiefs nation (arrowheadpride.com) is that a lot of us saw this coming. Whether its because of the lockout, or his inability to work with Haley (some argue this, though there's not much proof), we all thought his stay here would be short. Most aren't too upset, as his main job was to come in and fix the quarterback, which he has obviously succeeded at. Some names being thrown around as replacements for next year are Josh McDaniels (I would like this if he could get along with Haley, the guy is a great OC) and Nick Sirianni, the Chiefs current offensive quality control guy, who is supposedly being groomed for the job. Others think that Haley might take over the OC and HC jobs again, but his comments from earlier in the season prove otherwise (talked about the huge stress relief from not having two jobs). All in all, if Weis doesn't want to be in Kansas City then its best for both parties that he leaves.
I either use windex or the stuff I use to clean my motorcycle ([this](http://www.fastermotorsports.net/images/P/530396.jpg)) on the frame, whichever happens to be nearby.  WD40 on the chain/drivetrain before a fresh coat of lube.
someone send durr money so he can eat
Enjoy your Kool Aid.
Really? The first time I tried trees my friend had been giving me everclear and I had only been drinking for a couple months at that point. I think I vommitted all over that poor girl's bathroom.  Ever since then I can get wasted and smoke and be okay. Worst case, I vomit once and then I'm good to go. Never feel bad or get the major spins or anything.
Hm?
FAMAS is still considered one of the "try hard" guns in Black Ops. But that's all a bunch of BS. I don't think any of the guns are OP in Black Ops.  The AK74u outclasses all the other SMGs (MP5K is still pretty freakin' good though), so it doesn't really mean anything if you come in top 3 ahead of the 74u users if you're using an AR. What would be more impressive would be leading he lobby with the Kiparis or the MAC11 or something.
So a few years back (When the iPod 160 gig was NEW and the Zune was first launched) i went to a microsoft dev conference courtesy of my school. I wore my Tux shirt and got some EVIL glares from the 5 people with PC's. Everyone else had macs.  Anyway I had a zune, won a 160 gig iPod and said "I can trash my shitty zune!"  No one really liked me there 
There are many areas of the world where Google Voice isn't available such as Europe. Does this make all european android users noobs?
i would be consuming lots of weed tonight if i could but i cannot cuz i dont got none :(
I wanna be like mommy...
Made Lon Lon Milk should be a blast!
**AGREED.**
Not to mention...
...derp.  ...hurr.
STALKER bundle!!! http://steamcommunity.com/id/koex
Came here to say this.  And maybe teach them a bit about what credit is and how it actually works.
A fractional reserve bank giving a Nobel prize to a Keynesian? Shocker.
Tell me about it. I just hit 150 and got my Fossilized Raptor pet, and now I don't want to do it anymore.
why in the hell are there over 9000 down votes? 
I do this process by submitting a design with what I'm going to do.  Then people can take shots at it, and I will fix the design.  If it was a large commercial end-user product, that would be a different story, as it would need several different owners.  One of the reasons I stated for my work, when I worked in games, there had to be a split between the 3D engine and the game logic, it was too much to be a real expert on both.
Oh but it's ok! They only raped children! /sarcasm 
That's a horrible beer, only to be drank when hanging with the 50 and over crowd as a beer of last resort. Hint: [it's in the glass.](http://www.tastings.com/beer/perishable.html)
First off, this is a legit thing.  Second, text post karma doesn't count.
http://ezinearticles.com/?The-Four-Horsemen-of-Marital-Apocalypse&amp;id=613411
And her daddy has told her to go
My doctor told me I was too old to hyperlink.
Documentation tools would also like to have the comments in the syntax tree. But they also certainly wouldn't want comments only in pre-specified places.
 &gt;TCU's students are paying about $41k per year. It's a very wealthy school- endowment is $1.1 billion, which is second in the state of Texas, after UTexas and Texas A&amp;amp;M. Wouldn't that be third in the state of Texas?
&gt; cuz Jesus coming pretty much changed everything... Those morals are pretty relative, huh? &gt; This is what the LORD Almighty says: Go, attack the Amalekites and totally destroy all that belongs to them. Do not spare them; put to death men and women, children and infants, cattle and sheep, camels and donkeys. &gt; It was the LORD himself who hardened their hearts to wage war against Israel, so that he might destroy them totally, exterminating them without mercy, as the LORD had commanded Moses If Jesus hadn't come and "changed everything", would you gladly go on genocidal raids with the Israelites as commanded by the LORD?  Would you murder Amalekite babies? 
That is an amazing picture! Really, it is! The detail is incredible :)
Put a picture of her up so we can add her to the dogfort forces. 
skynet says hello
That's pretty clear if he waited for her.  What an asshole.  "My life sucks - so I'm going to scar the person I claim to love for life"
NOOOOOOOOOOOooooooooooooooooooo
You mean apart from the whole overdosing, addiction and myriad diseases that some drugs cause. Legalizing marijuana i can get behind but some are just not plausible.
Look for my book length reply lower on here, it addresses the CO2, not completely but a basic outline if you will. 
I had one of those. It was kind of shit.
TIL that show is not just a IT Crowd joke.
Word in the ocean, they plan to vote Democrat when given the chance.
The thing is, I'm pretty sure your mom set that "meet" up.  Pay close attention as your mom subtly brings her into conversation.  You may have laid no game down, but mom has been gaming you for some time now.
i'm not 100% sure.  the stats are available through [okcupid trends](http://blog.okcupid.com/) if you want to look into it.
I'd buy them. Once at least.
;(
Thank you for responding, and so quickly too.  Roar! 
Why bother? Social stereotypes have proven for years that girls neither cheat, nor masturbate.  
You are correct. To Protect and Serve is nothing more than a motto. It is not an oath, it is not an obligation and it's far from legally binding.  It is certainly the ideal though and I wish all officers actually held to it.
That's the point. Let's say I go take seeds from a wild plant I found in the middle of the woods.  Taking those seeds isn't considered "stealing" because you claim there's no private property.  I go and plant those seeds in some sand, anybody's sand.  I take care of them, raise them, and now have food.  I spent three months of my life growing food. Are you saying it's perfectly moral and acceptable for someone else to come and take that food?
I've always considered this footage pretty damned sweet except they never bothered to fix the rolling shutter, which would have been [easy](http://www.thefoundry.co.uk/products/rollingshutter/).
Thats a hard question. I think you just kinda have to decide for yourself.  I know how fuzzy that sounds, but I don't have all the answers.  Its very complicated.  I just know that I am a Christian and its a part of my journey. :)
Congratulations on your purchase of the absolute worst Final Fantasy game in the series.  Now, your enjoyment of any of the other FFs, such as Final Fantasy 7 (pretty damn good) or Final Fantasy 6 (total awesome) or pretty much any of the other ones save for FF8 will be completely overshadowed by your tainted memories of the worst game ever created.  In an attempt to partially alleviate your pain, I'll forcibly try to inject some humor into this sad, pathetic excuse for a game, with a few youtube videos.  [FFXII First Localization pass (better)](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nG_Z0rd7eK0&amp;feature=channel)  [FFXIII First Localization pass](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1MmG41Tllxo)
Did you hit the target then?
whad you say niggeR?
[](/okay)
Not more then Iraq, http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Iraq_War_death_toll perhaps you speak of the America soldier deaths? Everybody always over looks civilians killed in Iraq &amp; other wars.
Never any trouble, and a couple of them were very interested in the project.  And there was also another man who got some of the people involved in surveying one of the first all black graveyards.
You never go full retard...
I don't wtf that shit was, but I laughed, and I don't really know why.
&gt; It's like civilization has not marched forward for israel.  according to... you.
Your English is better than 90% of Americans. US here!  Merry New Year!
Yeah, I rejected that kind of nannying when I started taking responsibility for my actions as an adult.  Plus, unlawful confinement and all that.
Better audio would be better for sure. Next time, you should see if you can hook into the mixing board. Talk to the audio guys at the venue.  Also, I dunno if it just me, but I found the frame rate and motion very... weird. Almost seems like it was sped up somehow. Although I know it isn't because the audio is synced. What frame rate did you shoot at?
You lost me on both points. First: are you tied to Mozy? There are other online backup services that have Linux clients. Of course, you probably know this, so I'm guessing there's a reason. Second, and more confusing: Novell makes Linux clients for both eDir and Zen. Yeah, it's a pricey setup, but so is AD/SCCM, at the end of the day. I'm not saying that either of these facts are persuasive in switching to Linux, but they shouldn't be a hindrance, either.
"I know God exists because he talks to me personally."
Pasted straight into the address bar, or after loading the full link?
Mark Hamill's Joker on Batman: TAS.
You gotta admit, she looks good enough in a bikini to give a lot of guys a hardon.  Other mothers weep with envy.
I know too much useless crap to let this important fact go untold.
A porn site is a honey pot. It will attract many bees/men.
I know it was four hours ago, but Thank you!!! Happy NEW YEAR to you too :D
I'm talking about addiction... it's all the same.  Alcoholic or warcrafter medication emotions is addiction.  I just see it all in the same light.
Next time you do this, you have to time it perfectly so that when the hummingbird lands on your finger you can ejaculate on it! [](/perfect)
I interfaced with my Mac-pro's disk drive. Sexually.
Hey, I'm in Memphis.  Where do you train?  I'm a kung fu person, myself.  And as coincidence would have it, I have the key to the place I train.
This doesn't ring wholly true to me. The Catholic Church distrusted the Nazis as it could not exercise any influence or control over ithem. However, contrast this with the Church's much more cosy relationship with traditional fascist regimes in Spain, Italy, Portugal, [Croatia](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Usta%C5%A1e#Connections_with_the_Catholic_Church), etc where fascists could be relied upon to uphold Catholic values.   See [Clerical Fascism](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Clerical_fascism) for the links between religion and fascist movements.   The Catholic Church was also [instrumental in helping prominent and wanted Nazis to flee to South America](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ratlines_%28history%29#The_Roman_ratlines) after the War as it also did with Croatian Fascists - who, it could be argued, outdid the Nazis in cruelty and violence.   The Nazis certainly found broad support from large sections of the Catholic Church which also profited greatly from the [Church Tax](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Church_tax#Germany) which I am sure played no part in it's refusal to condemn the Nazi regime.  EDIT: If anyone wants to know what principled and uncompromising opposition to Fascism by a religious organisation really looks like, check out the [Jehovah's Witnesses](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Persecution_of_Jehovah%27s_Witnesses_in_Nazi_Germany) in this period.
Every console has plenty of games with it, I didn't feel like bringing all the new games out because I figured people would realize I have plenty of 360 PS3 and Xbox games, I don't have many for the saturn though
Were I indeed an idiot, I would much rather be that, than the moron bested by an idiot.
If everyone wanted to buy Raggedy Anne Dolls...There would be spam for them. You'd see advertisements with her creepy little button face all over the internet.  There would be websites for accessories for them.  Some of these websites would be filled with fake ads for them so somebody out there can make a buck off your click.  People want porn...People make money off viruses. Bingo.
It would make more sense to just have it be "after *x* amount of reports that aren't acted upon, user can no longer report".
I put [reddit] or a variant of [r/something] to show support for Reddit and, by extension, RUGC.   When a tag precedes your name, it detracts from the inclusiveness typically associated with Reddit.  For the record, the other RUGC servers don't use tags.  Therefore, I would recommend regulars place [r/westoo] or [reddit] *after* their name and let the original GWYM/H4D guys keep -TOO-.
Fuck them.  Move north where the winter takes care of the homeless the way God intended it. 
nope i rolled 3 or 4 days ago and im poor :( 
Most any green (with mint is a plus).
Ah ah ! You were right ^^
How bossy they are.
Whoever gets this is lucky. I love me some TF2. You're very generous for doing this OP, and I wish you a happy new year. 
/I put a few of them here: http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/etu2s/i_was_born_in_shchigry_ru_in_1932_i_worked_as_a/c1awh46  Yep, it's mostly been a refresher, as I've heard a lot of what he has to say on these topics before. But there have been some details that I've had clarified/ 
That's probably not really feasible if the guy needs to medicate somewhere between 2-6 times a day :)
so instead of my guns, I'm going to bring some plague I picked up while cheating the tax man by running a charity safari in africa.   it's going to suck to be you 
Dry gin Martini.  Beefeater, olives. 
What's the big deal?
How often was it a woman?
Here is an Internet hug. Things will work out. Don't give up hope.
This is proving to be a bit of an uphill battle. I have three handicaps:  * You are very skeptical/critical, you really really don't want to be convinced of this, I think; * This particular topic is not one I'm well practiced at, I'm hardly a champion at this; and * Harris kinda pulls things together but as you've noticed he hasn't just done something totally amazing like squaring the circle.  Still, the old college try. Thank you for being very civil and giving me a chance to blunder along here.  In the background, as I've meanwhile learned, were such classic philosophies as hedonism and utilitarianism. Hedonism is my personal favorite: It says, if I like it it must be good. This provides a unit of measure, though a mediocre one. Then there's utilitarianism: This says that one should try to achieve the maximum amount of good for everyone, but forgets to define what the measure for that good should be. Apparently it's possible to combine the two, so hedonistic utilitarianism seems to have been considered as a system for defining morality. Pleasing everybody is a reasonable start. One problem with this is that, especially with modern neuroscience, it's possible to make people extremely happy while totally screwing them over. That way lie various drugs, as well as wires in the brain. There's a sad tale of a little monkey they gave this button to, he kept pushing the button and ended up starving, but at least he died happy.  So by moving from simple pleasure (= hedonism) to well-being, Harris is introducing (or maybe just affirming) a sensible unit of measurement. We can take well-being to mean that not only is a person reasonably happy, but also he's not cruising toward some future ruin, he's not unhealthy and so forth. He's prospering, by any sensible standards. By spreading it out over all sentient beings, he's basically doing utilitarianism and extending it to animals too.  You claim this isn't new. I disagree; you're comparing Harris' "system" to what you and your common sense might come up with, and they're probably not far off from one another. Harris and his standards are, however, a radical improvement against the current moral standards of our societies. If you don't believe this, consider the huge body of horribly draconian laws that society applies to sexuality. There are all kinds of acts that harm nobody yet result (in the US) in being placed on the Sex Offenders' Registry, with an accompanying possible loss of home and livelihood, severe restrictions on freedom and so forth. Do you remember the outrage when Janet Jackson had a "wardrobe malfunction?" Nothing happened, and a whole damn country went nuts. Sex-related laws are one example of totally arbitrary, religiously mandated morals being applied instead of morals aligned with well-being. Sensible morals might result in legalizing pot, for example, as it turns out to be rather harmless.  You mention that the word "morality" has meanings that stretch far beyond suffering and well-being. That's exactly what's wrong with morals as they work today. "Morals" encompasses a whole lot of useless shit, much of it from religion. This is the "revolutionary" idea: Worry about people doing well, and forget about all the complicated arbitrary junk baggage!  You mention the burqa, and it so happens that Harris does too. A burqa is hot and heavy and restrictive, it limits a woman's movement and vision. No sane, un-brainwashed woman would freely elect to wear one, so why should she? There is no harm in her showing her face, neither to her nor anybody else. The only group who do it are the Muslims, and this is a pretty sure sign that it's one of those arbitrary religion-imposed morals. Trash it, and women will be better off. Harris says that, all else being equal, it's perfectly clear that a society that forces women to dress up in trash bags is worse than one that doesn't. I find this argument very easy to follow.  Moving right along to abortion. Science informs us that hardly anything is as worthless as a fresh embryo. We're talking about a tiny cluster of cells here, with less "life" than a worm or a tadpole, that needs to spend months being the parasite of a woman before it becomes a small human. No, an embryo is *not* a human, any more than an egg is a chicken. When I say "worthless" I don't mean to be disparaging. What I do mean is that the value people associate with these cell clumps is not only completely out of proportion with their human-ness, it's even completely out of proportion with their chance of ever attaining human-ness. It turns out, so I've read, that about half of all pregnancies *ever* end up aborting, for various little biological reasons, before the woman even knows she's pregnant. In discussions where God is part of the topic, it is often said that God is the biggest of all abortionists. Take God back out of the picture, and you have a reproductive system that is marked by a huge amount of waste and redundancy. The reproductive system is remarkably fragile, and things keep going wrong for purely natural reasons. So a "fresh" embryo can't be considered of much value because it has so little potential of ever becoming a fully developed human.  You cringe at the idea of destroying a potential human life. My take on it is this: Until it's a living, conscious, breathing human being, it's not alive. It's nothing more than a funky cyst in the mother's body. Embryos are incredibly cheap and plentiful, if the mother does not want the baby then it has no value even to the mother, they are not sentient so terminating them does not cause any suffering. It's a far greater tragedy to bring a child to term against the wishes of its mother, who ends up in economic dire straits, has trouble adequately caring for the child and ends up raising an underprivileged child in impoverished conditions. Let that same woman raise the child 5 years later, when she has the resources and the time, and you have a thriving, prospering, successful child. It's a no-brainer as far as I'm concerned. Similarly, if she can adequately take care of 2 children but not 4, then if she doesn't abort that makes the difference between 2 thriving children and 4 growing up in squalor and poverty. This is no muddle, it's very clear cut. The cool thing is, you don't even have to worry about rights and cost/benefit ratios any more. On one side you have *no* human, on the other you have a human and his family living badly. Dead easy.  A question that will need some resolution is the priority balance between death and suffering. Personally, if I was faced with months of suffering with no improvement in sight, I would quickly choose to die. I consider a suffering self much worse than a dead self. Other people seem to have vastly different priorities: They would prefer to live as a vegetable, or in horrible pain, just so long as they are allowed to live. This doesn't make sense to me, but it's a question that wants to be addressed, surely.  This probably won't convince you, but it may make at least my standpoint (and I hope I've represented Harris' reasonably well) a little more clear.
Physical characteristics also arise from capability.  From Wikipedia,  &gt; Herbivores (such as deer, elephants, horses) have teeth that are adapted to grind vegetable tissue. Many animals that eat fruit and leaves sometimes eat other parts of plants, for example roots and seeds. **Usually, such animals cannot chew or digest meat.**  Edit: But there are animals that can do both and choose to do one. I think Hippos?
Not related to python and/or Java: [Code Complete 2, The Pragmatic Programmer]  Related to Python: [Hello World]  Stay away from Python Power! [It sucks.](http://www.amazon.com/Python-Power-Comprehensive-Matt-Telles/dp/1598631586/ref=sr_1_202?s=books&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1293840095&amp;sr=1-202)
Sure, being a figure head and purveyor of ”secrets” - “truth” a spokes person for those that desperately want the world to be a more altruistic place than it is..  No power there.. nope.. none what so ever... Are your friggin kidding me.. (insert visions of $$Palin$$ and every television evangelist ever here)   I would be curious to see his exact quote. Given his position you will have hard time convincing me that he made a statement similar to "but basically what he said is that they will come out with or without him, and that attacking him is pointless. " and is not at the VERY least insinuating blackmail.  Man I tell.. Wikileaks.. I love Reddit but this is one issue I completely disagree with the hive mind on. 
Wait wait wait... A *Republican* was attracted to a blonde with big boobs, rather than a young boy?  Now that's the craziest f*cking thing I've ever heard.
she was made by those who mine, and the miners keep her!
I had this problem with Majora's Mask, I even downloaded the hi-res textures and dug my USB N64 controller out. I sat down, finally figured out where to get my sword and shield, got lost, and quit.  I'm sorry /r/gaming, I tried.
I complained because I wanted to know what you're drinking and I couldn't read the label. Enlighten me.
if you know that you don't want to see somebody when they ask for your contact info, don't give it to them. you are inviting unnecessary disruption into your life and giving them false hope.  -girl
the shit is good, yo
¤cringe¤
my friend and i bought these and proceeded to go around town shooting nerf darts at people...good times
No. Fuck drinking.
although "delete" may be more descriptive of what the key does than "backspace", it does not allow for a differentiation between deleting the previous character (backspace) or the next character (delete) like a two-separate-key system does.
[Here you go](http://www.wowhead.com/talent#bfGorRsbcoMochbZ0b:qcmdzaVMz), people say that smite builds aren't viable anymore but that's simply not true. For me, my smite has a ~1.8s cast time with normal heroic buffs, and heals for 10-14k noncrit. I've seen it heal for 26k before (on a normal target, non-gimmick).   ninjaedit: You also have to use archangel whenever it has the swirly circle up (i.e. after 5 smites). That way your "heal" costs close to 500 mana per cast, and heals 10k+
I dunno, Stewart used to run comparison clips of pre-republican nominee McCain vs. the shift his platform took when he was running for president and they were two wildly different people.  Hundred had all of the 9/11 hero cred going for him and I don't think he was as liberal as you think.  The reason they chose Palin in our universe was to attract the loony x-tian fringe which McCain (who had previously been pro-choice) wasn't going to be able to hold on his own.  As I recall, Mitch kept his pot-smoking on the DL. Some of it, however, reflects Hundred's Henry V-like shift in personality as he set aside some of his principles to get to the presidency (which he needed to do in order to unite the nation against the upcoming war with the other universes). At least, that's how my pro-gay marriage, pro-legalization of drugs, pro-choice, anti-taxes, small government moderate brain interpreted the ending, YMMV.
I've also seen Armin, Tiesto, Cosmic Gate, Blank and jones, Ferry Corsten(three times), Freddie le Grande, Deadmau5, Filo and Pero, and a few more. &lt;3
Website?
I wonder what the OP is planning..
Didn't use the universal beta: didn't hold on.
Windows must cost a lot then, considering you need to find and install all the drivers, download all the software manually and click through endless rows of graphical installation processes just to get a usable system, whereas modern linux distributions just require you to insert the disk and mark off all additional software packages you want, and it will automatically load all drivers you need and download and install all additional software you want.
I suggest saving the mushrooms for later and taking them in a safe, pleasant environment- preferably outdoors. Any strong psychedelic like shrooms can get too real *right quick*, and I don't see much good coming out of shrooming at a party. 
so I read up on this... an it looks like she was in the wrong... why is this still being ranted about?
Much better than mine.  I was just going to buy some of your  [Penis Beauty Creme](http://www.myspace.com/video/vid/23765019).
Yep, in Dubai nobody gives more than 6 month warranty on batteries. not Delco, not Bosch, nobody. It's almost an annual expense, especially if you go with maintenance-free. I have better luck with standard batteries that you can refill.
I thought all of the standing water falls into the air in Australia.....
Mohammed's views on killing children, from the Hadith:  The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) used not to kill the children, so thou shouldst not kill them **unless** you could know what Khadir had known about the child he killed, or you could distinguish between a child who would grow up to he a believer (and a child who would grow up to be a non-believer), **so that you killed the (prospective) non-believer and left the (prospective) believer aside.** (Sahih Muslim 4457)  So, apparently it's OK for Muslims to kill non-Muslim children.
Lols for great justice
Once you decide to do something, there's no reason to wait until January first. It's gonna take you long enough already. Why procrastinate? Every day you spend working is a day closer to your goal. 
This is a super newb question but how do you install the mod, is it just simply downloading it? 
I have some job search advice, as a guy who spent a year looking for decent work with no real experience or unusual skills. Temp agencies!   If you interview with the agency and explain your situation (hours workable, lack of transportation) they'll let you know when they have jobs available that fit your skills and can often get you the jobs without additional interviews/applications. Easy data entry 6pm-8pm, light (less than 25 pounds) loading and unloading trucks 5am-8am, and being a receptionist 12pm-1pm are examples of jobs I did as a temp. Eventually I got a temp job where they hired me permanently and have since had a couple of substantial raises.  Temp agencies don't care if you turn down work offers, as long as you get back to them promptly and explain why (too far away, etc.). If you get on the regular lists for a few temp agencies you can be in a position to turn stuff down instead of being rejected yourself. Even if you never take any of those jobs it helps your confidence to get calls offering you stuff.  My wife applied for a job a while back and was rejected. A few months later the company asked a Temp agency for a temp to cover the job until they found someone, and she showed up. Within a week the company decided they'd hire her as soon as her term with the temp agency was up, and she's been there for almost two years.
This happened to my dad. I *think* its called balding.
I have yet to get a copy of this game. Maybe one of these days I'll just get over it and pay the money for it, I'm sure...
Why is Hank Hill blowing up that balloon?
Fair enough.  It's always an 'odd' thing to observe, from the outside looking in.  Thanks for the answers.
MP3tag + sharepod  Enjoy
i sold drugs when i was homeless and crashed wherever...i did that shit for 8 months out of my car...it was fun...
Favorite: First grandchild born May 21.   Dreadful: Wife intentionally setting house on fire April 26.
It's amateur night I am staying home and I am perfectly fine with that. 
And you, ma'am, are to blame for the death of said chivalry.   You don't know me, you don't know how I interact with women. You don't know that I am a gentleman towards women, that I hold doors out of kindness, that will take your jacket or help you into one, that I will allow you to go before me at the bar, even if I was there first.  I do these things, not because you're an outsider, or weak, or any of the words you're putting in my mouth. I do it because I was taught that you *respect* women around you, whether you know them or not.  You have made it abundantly clear that you simply have an axe to grind towards men. The more women I meet like you, the more stupid I feel for ever extending any kindness towards anyone. Apparently I'm just a condescending asshole.
Yeah it was a bit unrealistic in claiming that she independently worked out most of what Copernicus did by herself but some artistic license must be given I suppose and it was very interesting like you say.
Tag, you're it B12! Sorry about your luck.
Great band, great vocalist, RIP Mark.
You could try the Sacwich at Atwater, they have free sandwiches on your birthday. Three Amigos also gives you a sombrero on your birthday if you eat there. Pretty boss.
I thought the rule was in place for "excessive" celebration. Not minor celebration.
Hello John,  You have a wide audience, you have talked about how your words take life in the readers mind. I was wondering what kind of reaction do you create for. Is it to entertain your reader leading them through the story by the heart strings,or to connect with people and to find the common ground of these desperate peninsulas of human kind,to have your audience understand the subtleties of your hard work or to inspirer the reader make their own works ?
&gt; I might write some stuff sometime.  Please do.
/r/skateboarding as well.
Rafa seriously sucks in the transfer market .
I think I'm going to avoid driving tonight so I don't end up target practice for the crappy driving drunks out there. Thanks for the offer though. Any other night I'd be up for hanging with strangers from the internet and discovering what other wine I might actually like.
im new to minecraft and just bought a server if any of you noobs want to start a new world with me
God, Smashing Pumpkins live shows are the worst about this. All the songs sound like a blurry, distorted mess. The only way to differentiate the songs is by the drum patterns and the rare deciphered lyric. 
you do know that people have played with mercury without much harm about 20 years ago.  If you break a lightbulb and some mercury gets out you won't die.  The amount that is in one would do next to nothing. 
Samesies.  I fucking LOVE Jersey Shore, and I'm watching the marathon right now.  But I'm 21, and I love to laugh at it and how ridiculous everyone is.  These people crack me up. But if I were 12, I don't know how I'd be responding.  It definitely wouldn't have been appropriate for my 12 year old self.  OP, try to do something about your sister watching it, if you can.  She shouldn't be watching it, for reals.  Too much vulgarity, inappropriate sexual situations, and way too much idiocy.
A "beard" is the (fake) girlfriend of a gay guy so he can hide his gayness.  http://www.urbandictionary.com/iphone/#define?term=beard
Candid shot of girl smoking, how long till this hits the front page.
They do, it's just several minutes worth of benefit, to an hour lost.  If they were run more efficiently I would never complain about meetings, and when I run them I either cut it off after we finish the needful, or try to cram way more material than is really going to work in the hour to make the most of it (if it's an instructional meeting/lecture).
nice, ty for sharing!
*Fuckin' magnets, how do they work?*
I hope to see more of your work on here soon then. Good luck!
Eugh.
Yeah, but listening to her is painful.
No, dude. Stop. You guys are so in denial. You're your own worst enemy. You'll always be mediocre with Mark Richt. It's like he *likes* being mediocre. Maybe that's good enough for you. But it wouldn't be good enough for us.
Hey now, that's insulting to cocks. 
Get a pressure cooker!
I once went to Wendy's as well and also ordered a Spicy Chicken Burger, and when I opened the bag, there was no burger in there at all. :(
I'll show you around!
Since this is for your personal interest, you can do this without the inherent backwardness that most school curricula seem to employ.  Start from the beginning: What is Science? This would involve looking into the classics of rational thought and the scientific method, starting with history (personally, I think the Greek philosophers are where it really got going). A good source for any of these: check out the books people are recommending herein.  Next, you can sample the basics of some key fields. This distinction is, I suppose, well done in High School the world over: Biology, Physics, Chemistry. But also, the social sciences provide an interesting use for the scientific method. That's more of a college topic, though.  Biology: There is a LOT of material in this field, and HS seems to approach it by forcing a tonne of specific memorization. I'd start with the fundamentals. Genetics, phylogeny, and their culmination into evolution (my second favourite science topic). Then you might branch out into the more specific stuff like biochemistry or neurology (my third favourite topic).  Physics/Chemistry: This subject has a rich history that underscores how we mingle thought with process in science. You can follow history from Galileo through Newton for basic dynamics, and then see how thinking outside the box can yield theories that adapt long-"understood" laws into a greater framework with Einstein's Special and General Relativity (my personal favourite subjects in Physics). On the other hand, you can explore how we've historically modeled matter, starting with the 4 elements, and then with the advent of science and reason discovering more and more, and eventually arriving at the Bohr model for the atom, but then moving on and finally coming to quantum mechanics. Understand these can let you branch out into things like Astronomy/Astrophysics.  I think you are going to have a lot of fun reading up on this stuff!
1: Lose arms race to America.  2: Copy Americas design saving billions of dollars.  3: Watch as America collapses under it's obscene military budget. 
It's [Top Secret](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Am20WpLtkUY).
any one can just walk into morder, but can they comeback?  also catapults!
Can you heeeeeeeeeeeeere am I sitting in my tin can.. far above the moon 
"Cause I'm fucking special" Awesome. Upvote for you.  What a douche, hopefully he did calm down.
Well, I suppose my assertion was premised on the nearly universal assumption that no human life is intrinsically more valuable than another, but of course that premise can be called into question.  Also, as killing a chicken provides resources, killing a newborn preserves resources. So would you say that so long as there is a legitimate reason to kill the newborn, it should be okay? What if you were to breed and kill some newborns to eat them?
oh I realize it isn't thick. Grew up on this lake in NH, 4 inches is about the thinnest ill go out on. unnerving but not that dangerous. wouldn't drive my truck out there to set up a fishing hut but a little walk is fine. im glad im not a statistic either.
I said something to this very nature about a good deed that a Redditor did yesterday and the first response I got was someone saying that I 'shouldn't treat Reddit like the final bastion of humanity' or something like that. I responded by stating that I knew Reddit was not the problem to world hunger but it is awesome to hear people's experiences and about how people relate to each other by overcoming distance, creed, nationality, gender, and sexual orientation by exercising care. It's more of a community than many perceive.
Here you go:  Get the best gun you can find.  Shoot enemies in the head with it.  Pick up the guns they drop, see if they're better.  If the guns are better, use them.  If the guns are not better, sell them.
Yeah, it often takes someone with quite a unique type of intelligence to think out of the box to a degree sufficient enough to solve some of the more complex problems in life.
Grew up watching this.
The band is underappreciated.
TLO beating NoNy with nothing but speedlings (and a banelings here or there) during I believe the HDH Invitational.  Or the MasterAsia vs TT1 game where it came down to a few buildings, a zergling, a zealot, and a drone to decide the win. The way that game ended was golden.
Wow this makes a lot of sense dude.  http://www.anon-web-tools.edu.tc
Dude, your closing bracket was so excited about getting you to a [10] that it turned into a fucking exclamation point!
Law enforcement officers see the harm that imprisonment does vs the harm that the drugs do, and that is why more and more of them are saying to reduce harm by legalizing all drugs. Portugal decriminalized all drugs not too long ago and they are already seeing great results from it.
They say a lot of the things are staged. That in a real survival situation you wouldn't come across nearly every obstacle possible. The point of staging it, is so you have an idea of everything that can go wrong and how to react.
I'm not a psychologist, but if that helps you get through the day, I can't see it doing any harm. Also, Happy New Year. Each day brings us one step closer to the cure.
I'm sorry but you're a fucking idiot.  Of course there are good cops.  I've met plenty of them.  I've met plenty of douchebag power-tripping asshole cops too.  It's been more than once that I would have gotten arrested/charged but I didn't because out of the 4-5 cops there the one "cool" cop (the reasonable, calm, friendly one) talked the rest out of it.  Or not even regarding me doing illegal shit like smoking weed... how about the cops that responded to my house within 5 minutes the day my mother died and I called 911?  Sure, they couldn't save her, but they were nice and polite and helped me through the most hellish day of my life and if she HAD been in a position to be saved I would owe it all to the fucking EMERGENCY PERSONNEL like the police.  A lot of cops are shitheads, and a lot of other cops turn a mostly blind eye to those shitheads and I'm not saying any of that is fine with me.  My point is that there ARE good cops, and furthermore that you're a naive, teenaged shitstick that needs to get the fuck off the internet and try real life on for a size if you refuse to believe that.
Who was also his mother.
What if you need your computer to do that thing?
Is there still a team working on converting Opposing Forces to the Source engine?   I really want to play that game again.
Draw a turtle eating a turtle that is humping a turtle and the turtle being humped is eating the first turtle.
"What are you gonna wipe down the inside of your stomach?" [](/troll)  Swallow my nut bitch! [](/fy1)
 [Done!](http://getsatisfaction.com/mojang/topics/ice_caves-so9q5)
Daemon - Daniel Suarez  Freedom - Daniel Suarez (sequel to above)  Patient Zero - Jonathan Maberry (Zombies)  Lucifers Hammer - Larry Niven and Jerry Pournelle (1970's ish comet impact disaster)
I believe he is a troll, or terrible at his job. "Three gold albums and one multi-platinum album" might sound good, but 15-20 years ago, labels would average more than that every month even store owners would earn that many every few months, or on a good month (like December).  OP also claims to have worked for a few separate labels and have run his own "successful" labels, to me that sounds like no label wanted to keep him around for long enough to start to make any serious business and after failing has tried to start his own label.  Since this *is* a AMA, are you a troll or a failed music industry executive?   To answer your question MrMatters, when you hear a song has gone platinum it is the same thing, the artist and label get the platinum and if a single store (lets just say big bobs records) sells enough for platinum the owner will also receive the award, which might sound rare, but most stores are big chains (in Canada we have HMV for example) and my old man ran stores in Ontario called Cheapies (over 25 years ago, before I was born) with about 14 stores and has won multiple gold/platinum records.
It may be real or fake, he's stupid regardless. He could have followed the train track along the ground and climbed up the hill. That would have been both easier and safer.
Did you forget to sign back into your other account?
I think that when you are drunk is the best time for you to be in possession of a gun :)
shoot the messenger...?
They're smart enough to deserve not to be killed when they're smart enough to avoid our nets.
Well, duh!
You could send proof to mods so they could add the star to your post... It is just kinda hard to believe that.
it makes sense this is being downvoted.
Not really, I mean if it happens it happens but unless I publish something in an academic journal that causes people to rethink everything they know, I'm probably not going to be famous.  Alrighty, I'll probably post mostly 2-4 AM PST, since I'm visiting home for the holidays.
I actually did this in 2000.  TFC ftw. 
Just decided to give the series a try on the ps3 and yes it is... but the HE 44 in Resistance 2 (OMG THIS GAME IS AMAZING) is quite &lt;3
Yes I do the exact same thing. Heres my [hole](http://min.us/mvbDnUB#1) I built. Mines only 10x10, but goes all the way down to bedrock. What do I do with it? Absolutely nothing.
in fact its cold as hell
[GIYGAS!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ikT4lz4qCCI)
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=k7brtsYPP24
I try not to blame myself. Its hard, there are a lot of ways I could have improved the situation. I was too hurt and angry to care about his feelings at the time.
Since when are PR campaigns sacred and not open to being used in derivative works?  While I agree that a little proofreading would have been nice, the addition extends well the point that being an atheist doesn't mean you can't be good, by adding that being a Christian doesn't make you good either.
so who else got sucked into a 30 minute marathon of playing QWOP after reading that comment?
My friend and I did that with beef jerky.
troll cat
this would eliminate knocking cups over
Then bring it up. Communication is key in a relationship.
Swim, swim, hungry.
Remember that you aren't trying to impress everyone. If it so happens that you are in a group of people and not saying anything that's fine, and if you have a great conversation that's fine too. Nothing is awkward unless you accept it as being so. 
[Here](http://i.imgur.com/RKKau.jpg) is a rage cookie. 
Agreed. When I made my "Been to Prison" AMA, Quite a few of the people I told about it had difficulty finding it because, like me, they were unaware that there is a difference between r/AMA and r/IAMA. 
I kinda figured out who he was right away, even though they took practically the entire film to confirm it  was clever how he wore a visor the whole time- save on anti-aging CGI...
where you at in the Chi?
What did he say? Now I want to know...
I only hope that you will question your view a bit more. I don't want to bicker, I don't think your tiredness of it means I won. In general, I'd say we've both shown how little anthropology really *knows*, and how much of it is theory and conjecture. Most likely, something between our two viewpoints is closest to the truth. It might just come down to the individual members of your tribe, or the weather that year.  A lot of anthropologists that defend the idea of the noble savage do and did so for political and ideological reasons. It was a sharp reaction to the idea of 'constant progress', and a flag taken up by the feminist and hippy movements. That's part of the reason I stand strongly against it. I don't know if it's false, but it bothers me to see people accepting it as unquestionably true.  Many anthropologists supporting it have a tendency to present theories as irrefutable facts, and it has gained far more prominence than it should, partly due to the romantic notions that come along with it. It's kinda bad science that way.
It's just the default mail signature. It can be seen when composing and removed manually, or removed/changed using the mail settings.
&gt; Nassau County shows how easily responsible government can collapse in this country, now that one of our major parties believes in budget magic. All it takes is disgruntled voters who don’t know what’s at stake — and we have plenty of those. Banana republic, here we come.  Hello, 2001!  It's 2011 here!
I use folders on my iPod touch 4th gen all the time! I imagine the icons may a little harder to see on the devices without the higher resolution screens, but for me, I find the folders to be incredibly useful.
Windows Domain Admins.
subtonix knows how to heat meat.  This is a great recipe.   Now if you had access to a grill.... 
Needs a better f-stop!
Be careful with Wal-Mart. The store doesn't care, but the cops do.
it's like riding a bi- oh wait...
that horrible crunch when you hit another car with your own. fortunately, i had slammed on the brakes and wasn't going that fast and no one was hurt. also it was the other party's fault [just putting that out there].  alternatively, my darling rattie when i accidentally closed the cage door on his tail. no serious damage, just a heart-breaking squeak. for that matter, that ear-piercing yelp-whine when i was rough-housing with my puppy and i got a little too rough. again, no permanent damage.  i am fortunate that i've got nothing worse that.
Accepted by the government, or the people? The acid attack *method* may not be accepted, but its reasoning most definitely is.  There are plenty of examples if you don't like that one. Arranged child marriage. Arranged child marriages to old men. Punishment for premarital sex or adultery.  Are we not allowed to question these things simply because culture is "relative"?
Read that article, and that this passage:  &gt; While the task force is in session, the attacks on humanity continue: The North American east coast is overrun by Pfiesteria-infested crabs that attack New York City, Washington D.C. and later Boston  Sounded hillarious  "SHUT THE WINDOWS! THERE ARE CRABS ON THE LAWN..... NO..... NOOOOO !!!!!!"
UCF was an amazing team this year.
I think I found the troll, you guys.
Eggs get cracked.
pansy
Reposting ripoffs is right rediquette.
Tvivlar på att detta år kommer att föra så mycket "gott" med sig, blir väl antagligen samma jävla skit som alla andra år, dvs man jobbar och super ett helt år för att intala sig att man har ett "liv", och finner sig ändå sittandes ensam framför datorn på nyårsafton skrivandes bittra inlägg på forum.
So, to summarize your argument, you believe in something that can neither be proved nor disproved. Okay, so what's the point of discussing it, then? I believe in a *metaphysical* flying spaghetti monster. What makes you right and me wrong?
Install KDE it's been there since around Vista time.
Which clearly no other Apple store has, oh wait, Boston location and others do.
Sorry, "crackanape," from the context of your first post, I didn't suspect that minding manners was a priority.  Obviously your experience differs from mine, and I would suspect it's more limited, since you cited trend followers and uni students as your resources.  Depending on where I was in the world, feelings ranged from general animosity to disgust, with common sentiments such as (paraphrased, of course) "American's are the richest, fattest, and laziest people on the planet," "They continue this atrocious war," "They paved the way for this economic crisis," and "Why won't they stand up for themselves?" Now I've answered you more thoroughly than you deserve.  Go play elsewhere; your derogatory sentiments add nothing of consequence.
What are you doing tonight to keep yourself busy?
I'm also playing a holy priest and most of the things I have been reading say that spirit is #1 priority. Would you agree with that?
This is basically a robot chicken episode minus the claymation.
Yeah, I do. I've also noticed that in the year or so that I've had my own car, whenever I'm about to fall asleep, I'll have these visions of swerving into oncoming traffic.
If you're still doing this, how about [this guy](http://a1.twimg.com/profile_images/1082421006/5th_girls_crop.jpg).
You should cross post to [/r/freebies](http://www.reddit.com/r/freebies/)
Attention whoring is always bad.
...while he feels her up
As a Pyro: airblasting an enemy to safety.
I used to work in the shady end of my hometown setting up events like farmers markets and things. I cannot even estimate how many homeless people I have called 5-0 on. If they're breaking the law, then by all means call the cops on them. Homeless or not.
&gt; [Hitchens] also mentioned “clerics” who stood in the way of women bettering themselves. Blair had a golden opportunity here to go on the attack: what had atheism to offer women...  Tu quoque.  Atheism has done nothing for women's dignity, nor anything else. People with good morals and common sense can be thanked for giving women equality and dignity.
Of course you didn't rape them, they were all consenting. [](/poker "incidentally they were all into bondage")
So if I live in say, Short Pump and I need a ride home from the city I am out of luck?
Oh look! Somebody else to add to the list of "I've only been playing since Wrath!" and ignore.
I am usually against this, but if we ever cross paths I will give you a handy jay.  Oh, and I actually have a game controller that I really want to use.
Yokozuna is pretty damn good.  It's more asian-inspired than asian, but the food is great.  I recommend the duck, I think it's something like $28.
I had plans, but they all fell through. Maybe I'll read a book or write a song tonight. 
Don't touch my bags if you please, Mr. Customs man.
hopefully not too shortly or it can't be that bumpin' of a party!
But her friend is nowhere to be seen...
If you're playing an ambusher/flanker strategy, then Axestinguisher.  That crit is very nice combined with the degreaser, but it is good with the default flamethrower too.  There's something gratifying about axestinguishing a slow to turn Heavy.  It also can help you make short work of other classes near the cart: one flame, then switch to axe for the rest.  It's also nice on soldiers and demos, since they take longer to burn then other classes, during which time they can cause a lot of damage.  If you're playing more of a spy-checking defensive (even for offense), the homewrecker is great.  Since you're looking for spys anyway, you are going to be near sappers.  And you can solve that horrible situation where you kill the spy but the engie is dead, so you have to watch as the sentry, tele, and dispensor die from sappers before your eyes. Also, if you're a pyro who barely uses melee, this is the best choice, since you can treat it like a sapper remover rather than a weapon.  I don't like the powerjack.  In any situation I'd be using it, the axestinguisher is better.  If they're at nearly full health, it will take a few powerjack hits and you may die.  If they're near full health, the axestinguisher crit is much more worthwhile.  I could only see the powerjack as really useful when you're not really using a flamethrower, but how often is that?  I have not used the Backscratcher yet.  The standard fireaxe I never use.  Again, when are you generally engaging in melee when you haven't just set your opponent on fire?  When you're out of ammo or engaging an enemy pyro.  If you're out of ammo, it's a desperate situation anyway, and not worth planning for.  And if I'm fighting another pyro close range, flamethrower without afterburn is still my preference.
I like tacos.
Lose your car again?
firework.  its more like katy perry's boob exploding music video scene.
If they were truly Great and truly British, they'd let you in anyway.
earlier this week my friend was in town visiting, he went to the gas station to get cigs and had very bad timing as the gas station had just been robbed, when the police asked him for id he questioned them and that prompted them to tase him 3 times throw him to the fround and arrest him for obstructing justice, my friend is black, its fucked up that the cop is probably going to get away with this kind of behavior.
whoosh.
This happened to me when not using USB headphones but luckily my keyboard has a sound card in it with it's own jack, so yay for Logitech. Kinda sucks for everyone else...
TL;DW  He goes early DT, I scout the Twilight Council and immediately chrono an observer and an immortal (to cover DTs and blink).  He comes in (I don't manage it *superbly*) and I repel it.  So now what? Keep going DT!  I end up getting ahead in supply *and* income, even though he kills some probes.  I do a push against his main while he tries to harass some more and kill him.  He calls me a faggot. :)
People downvote because he said something about apple and it wasn't critical
Your fired.
Affected*
Really? The guy I hate the most is Tanner. He's way too preppy, and ever since he chose the Fiero, I just can't stand him.
If you have a Barcelona crest besides you, then your automatically gifted :) 
I read down far enough to find someone who had already written what I was thinking.  Wish I could upvote you more than once!
DURSİYE
I think petrified mutant dog is more suitable.
&gt;One may argue that intelligence has a direct impact on suffering - that is, a more intelligent being is more capable of processing and appreciating suffering than is a less intelligent being.  On what basis can one argue that? A human being, a dog and a fish would all shun pain stimuli like electric shocks. Can one measurably claim that the dog or fish suffer less from those pain stimuli than the human being?  You also (seem to) make the assumption that suffering is dependent on brain complexity and/or neurological development, but what if suffering is more dependent on the sensors in the body than neurological development? Some animals have more sensors and more sensitive sensors in their bodies than human beings. Do those animals suffer less when pain stimuli are applied to them because their brain is smaller? 
Somehow, that made sense.
No. I was as ugly then as I am now.
Haven't watched it since the 90's and I don't even want to.
the sound of death.....
Racist. And misogynistic, and hostile to other LGBT people (biphobia, transphobia). Yes I do. But then, I think it's weird for anyone. 
They gave a reason why they included this amendment, but they did not limit the reasons to this one.  The amendment does not say that you are required to be in a militia to own a firearm.  Its intent is the opposite.  That a well-regulated militia requires firearms.
Think about it. How popular is porn? Well shit, it has helped make the internet. Do the math. Think of the people who visit porn sites. Almost everyone. To easy to transfer through with porn. Its the only place where people will download stuff without doing a virus scan. You really going to stop and scan when your dicks in your hand?
Take a look [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/Eve/) and [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/evedreddit/), the first is EVE's general /r/, the second is Dreddit's /r/. Dreddit is Reddit's "official" corporation in game, join us (your reddit accout fullfills the requeriments to join), we'll show you the ropes and help you punge straight into the fun. 
I got a rope (my first!) for Christmas and have been dying to go climb outside, but it's been raining! I've just been walking around the house in my harness, rappelling and jumaring up my rope hung from my pull up bar.
i like xplay because they just use 1-5. i mean whats the difference btwn 94 and 95 when rating a game? they both deserve a 5/5.
X-Play gave it a 3/5.
People disassociate the two - they think engagement means "serious girlfriend" rather than "eventual wedding". Though two years is fine, they may just be busy.
I have a co-worker who hates bacon and PBR...I'm not a fan of his beliefs.
Agreed. Cognitive dissonance doesn't mean that someone behaves hypocritically, or that someone expresses contradictory ideas or behaviors.
Hey Nimrod.  I'm sitting. Right. Over. Here.  Actually, Calvin does pretty much sum up my view on goofy assed resolutions.  If you see something worth changing, don't wait until a holiday to do so.
Not one of my friends who have been caught drinking were planning on driving. Two of my friends just finished their court dates and the total fines and court fees for them was over $1500 for the two of them. They were walking back to their dorm and blew a .027. It took four cops to write them up. When I was 14 my friend and I went into a store to get a drink, not even 2 minutes later we came back out and my friends bike was gone and a group of sketchy teens was missing a person. We flagged down a cop, but he said it wasn't within his jurisdiction and we should call 911, even though we could see the kid riding down a side street. They never even interviewed the kids outside. Last year my friend walked his drunk girlfriend home and then walked back himself, he had nothing to drink, but a cop stopped him anyway and made him do a sobriety test, threatening with disorderly conduct. He let him go after he blew a .00.   I have more stories, but the moral is that I have 0 respect for the police in my town. They have NEVER done any good for me. All they have done is get me and my friends in trouble for the dumbest of "crimes"
Totally. Rounds of horse were the best. They usually ended in physical violence to get your opponent to end their trick.  *Hey, fuck you, plug my controller back in, I almost have a gorillian points.*  You are a **HORSEDICKS**
Thanks for the feedback!  &gt; For starters, toooo rectilinear.  Very true.  &gt; Perhaps a judicious use of a handwritten font and definitely have a daily word and definition dominate the page  Two things: I can't think of an example in recent memory where a handwritten font has worked out well.  (But as I've demonstrated ;) I'm not a designer so I don't really keep that sort of thing in memory.)  Also, dominating the front page with a word-of-the-day is what Urban Dictionary does.  Though I started my site a couple years before UD, I'd worry about appearing to rip off their design.  Do you think a word-of-the-day is more interesting than what's currently the "highlight": recently added definitions?  &gt; ...anything but having to clicking through the alphabet sequentially.  I don't really understand this feedback.  There are several other ways to navigate (by date, word list, thesaurus, search) so clicking through the alphabet sequentially is just one option.  Maybe the other navigation methods are overshadowed by the alphabetical navigation?  Again, thanks so much for the feedback!
That is really great.  I was once asked to go to a hospital by my therapist, but I was too afraid of the social stigma (You see I am also a psychologist, so you would think I would know better, but still I was afraid that my collegues would find out).  Have you experienced any stigma from it? Also congrats on making the right steps, you are brave and hopefully better off for it.
Take out a big life insurance policy on them and kill them all. You'll never get caught.
What are their exchange rates like? Last I checked they were eating about 4% on USD-EUR transfers.
&gt; Charitable gifts are lovely, but they do little to stimulate the economy?  Sure they do.  The handout gets spent - and that spending stimulates the economy.  Though I think the economy would be benefited just as much if he bought a luxury yacht - creating jobs for steel (and other materials they use) workers, ship builders, a boat crew, etc.  Only two bad things he could do with it would be (a) hoard it for future generations, or (b) pay much of it in taxes (much of which would probably go to invading other countries).  And for those who say 'hoarding' is actually putting the cash into banks which then loan the money to businesses, and that this is somehow good - no, it isn't.  All it really amounts to is another tax on entrepreneurs (in the form of interest payments to the bank).   Far better for the small businesses if the money was just spent on their products directly.
Why would you subject yourself to that?
It was late. and I was tired.
You've got it all wrong... gatorade is better because it gets you all sticky. Best day of my life was when my buddy projectile-spit gatorade into a cabbie's face.
What a mindless freakin ... never mind, sorry, the world is a far better place for this achievement.
Glad to see she has excellent musical taste.
1 am here. where is the empty bottle i might ask?csure i got you covered with two of those already taking space in my flat. yes i said flat. sue me.
I think Overeem would eat a 135 pounder for breakfast.
Super fit? I'll give you fit, but that girl is definitely not super fit. Good body nonetheless.
I think it has a lot to do with the fact that I play on Hard.  If I die and I have to walk for 8 in-game days to my project, well - let's just say I won't be finding my diamond picks.  Movable spawn points at a high cost would fix this, I think.  Since either way, we're playing close to our spawn points, might as well let us explore a bit.  And nether, minecarts, and boats just aren't enough to relieve this pressure.
Ain't nuthin' but a G thang, baby...
I tested the gas/tide mix when I was told about it. Stuck on any surface and burned, just like the news footage. Gas/styrofoam might work too...
There are some grammatical problems that a few quick re-reads should be able to mend. For example:  "The puzzles had all been solved by mid May, a gift from his then wife and now angry litigious ex-wife was meant as an anniversary present for their 3oth back in January."  There's a subject missing from the second clause. It should be  "The puzzles had all been solved by mid May, a gift from his then wife and now angry litigious ex-wife *that* was meant as an anniversary present for their 3oth back in January."
"Why are things so heavy in the future? Is there a problem with the earth's gravitational pull?"
Someone needs to make carrot shaped waffles.  Oh! can anyone point me to the origin of this? One day I landed on Reddit and the meme was already a good 6 hours old so I was completely lost. I thought I had stepped in to another reality and I liked it.
Agreed, the track in Montreal is great and the atmosphere in the city is incredible. Personally I'd like to go to Montreal in 2011 and Texas in 2012, just don't know if I can afford it...
Nope not wet enough. Let me lick it for about an hour. That should get it wet enough. 
I asked my prom date in 12th grade. I asked him as a friend, but later found out he had a crush on me, so I took it from there. I had the confidence knowing he already liked me.  I initiated what became a very long-term relationship. Again, already knew he liked me, so it was easy to do without being rejected.  And most recently, I sent the first message in a series of lengthy messages/AIM conversations/dates. But since it was through online dating, I can't really pretend like there's a ton of courage involved there. Rejection is just not hearing back.
You could get the home address of [WHORES](http://www.nationalreview.com/corner/256043/mother-nature-vs-nanny-charlotte-hays) like that one...and go pay her a visit.  Violently send a message that the idiocracy will not be tolerated.  p.s. that fucking philistine conservative whore at the NRO started this agit-prop. And what is sad is that it isn't necessarily about incompetence, or assigning blame, it is just another proxy for the articulation of right wing *anti-labor* policy.
Avoid using DoTs. They don't heal at all. Just holy fire -&gt; smite spam, and repeat with holy fire on cooldown. Don't forget penance to stack grace though.
Has barely answered any of the questions posed after 17hrs: check  Doesn't provide details about the situation: check  Just sayin'
The reason is because society expects everyone to do everything right, which is why when they make a mistake, they are pointed out so much.
Last I heard it was either Day[9] or Psy who mentioned that the two had an argument and were not going to be working together anymore. 
FUCK YOU DIE IN A FIRE.
&gt;sweaty, packed bar night dodging blackout drunks and avoiding fights.  I said it a few days ago and I'll say it again. What kind of shitty bars do the majority of Redditors patronize? I like to go to bars in moderation and I've not had anything but a good time. I don't get it.
lol. Can I have that kid?????
Sure, but it is one that is absurd?
I agree, but most people around here think that one man taking a wild shot that just happens to go in due to a keeper error shows amazing technical ability and what football  is really about. One man vs 11 others.  *End Rant*
Well, the story was kinda cool, but it wasn't really very well written, IMHO.
I am. My friends once spent about ten minutes arguing what gay subset I belong in, they determined I'm not a hipster, I'm not an alterna-gay, I'm not a trendy gay, I'm a fashion gay.
is skateboarding x-games style when you hunt down people while riding a skateboard, or just hunting down skateboarders? I'd watch either as long as everyone wears a belt.
[One on Me](https://www.amazon.com/dp/0879975083?tag=ircnewsgarde-20&amp;camp=0&amp;creative=0&amp;linkCode=as1&amp;creativeASIN=0879975083&amp;adid=1YK4X1J76NC4FD80MMFX&amp;) by Tim Huntley. One of the funniest books I've ever read. Huntley hasn't written many books but he won an Academy Award and was nominated for a couple of others. 
Nothing is expected from you, or shouldn't be. Certainly not a card, just tell him 'Congrats' and leave it at that.
Krugman is a fucking retard.
you must be catholic.
Straight to the guillotine
How the fuck do you do that every week? OCD?
I live just over a quarter mile away from the bar I'll be partying at tonight. Even though it's freezing outside I'm still leaving my car at home and walking. 
Exactly how I Felt, I played a bit of TF2 beforehand, I thought I wasn't gonna like TF2 but I did, seeing as though I'm an old schoolish person, preferring Unreal and Quake and haven't transitioned nicely to what everyone else is now playing.  BC2: The weapons are bullshit, but after the first few rounds as assault (The only class which doesn't piss me off, aka, mutual piss me off, if I hate it when people play that class, I won't play that class. Yet as an American Soldier, please enjoy your fucking AK family weapon, please also enjoy dying via a Russian M60) I gained the XM8 assault rifle, shit was getting better from then on in, I unlocked the FN2000 (Spray of doom), my magical neverending throwable ammo fanny pack and an optical dot sight-The game is now playable, grats for passing the troll4urLyf test.  Thinking about playing Hardcore soon, sounds groovy. Delayed it though, too busy and I heard BFBC2 was having server/stats troubles, makes playing pointless I guess, well, as a noob.  Snipers, the snipers... &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
You can watch porn in 3D now so get some glasses asap !  http://youporn.com/3d
A 10db increase is perceived to be about twice as loud by the human ear.
Oh yeah then why wasn't war declared, then? Because of chickenshit, thats why.
I just prefer the Asian cowgirl.. No hands needed
Can we please get a clear picture.
This should not make me laugh as much as it did, but I was just laying in bed while my girlfriend put a new shirt on and she didn't know there was still a tag on it.  She ripped it off and said, "Oh shit, it says *large* on it, too! Nobody wants to see that shit!"
The name was changed to Maria Hernandez Park in 1989. Before that it was called Bushwick Park, and is still called that by many locals (and maps). Mostly the new arrivals call it Maria Hernandez.
Now they know the guy's birthday so they can have agents there making sure nobody sings the song without paying royalties..
Bobbyham Lincoln
Maybe.  But in the original context I was answering an assertion that Marxism is kleptocracy because it denies private property (which is tantamount to theft).  Admittedly, I switched from discussing Marxism to Anarchism, but that was largely since the first person to declare "All property is theft" was Proudhon (an Anarchist) not Marx.  Since that point I've presented fairly standard Anarchist analysis of why that is so.
The bigger issue is that it won't work - unless if he feels like banning stocks, bonds, and money market funds, people will simply move their money there instead, and instead of a "banking multiplier", you will instead end up with a far harder to control system that is far less stable.  Controlling bank lending is hard. See: China.
"at" v3.1.12 on Ubuntu 10.10 is okay. 
poor man's JD
They'd think that I'd finally lost it completely.
you choo choo choose me?
Are you diabetic?
Friends help you move, real friends help you move bodies.
You're a native English speaker, so your first instinct will be to use your own language. Plus, you are not fluent in Japanese, so it's more difficult for you to speak it than English. When you reach a point that talking in Japanese is not a conscious effort to make sure it all sounds right and works grammatically, then you may reach a point where you can think in Japanese unconsciously.
It does not taste great. I'm no beer snob, but C'mon man, even regular budsweiser is better.
i'm sorry bro, if i had money i'd send you some.
Have you seen the long ones on a male Worgen? Best in the game, imo.
Been hoping too long.  unfortunately hope doesn't put food on the plate nor pay rent.
Delete and forward delete?  Or ⌫ and ⌦
I think I could deal with the being broke part.  Not much different from real life, so WHEEEEEEEEEEEE!!
The ["green goo"](http://www.theiet.org/forums/forum/messageview.cfm?catid=205&amp;threadid=36518) is degraded di-isoctyl phthalate; it occurs in cables when the copper reacts with the pvc insulation.  Replace the cable.
You think 4 inches is thick?
Well, I guess I think you should read the book before you judge it. Regarding cultural relativists: they are everywhere, and they are frequently powerful.  Critics of Islam routinely meet left-wing opposition that claims exactly that "that is just their way."   I've personally heard college-educated American liberals defend genital mutilation, suicide bombing, burkas, and pedophilia on such grounds.  They think they are supposed to, because, there being no God, morality is just whatever a particular culture decides it is. The encounter that specifically inspired Harris to write the book was one in which some woman who is on a special committee for bioethics appointed by Obama (or something) was calling him out for claiming that it may be objectively true that forcing women to wear burkas is not the best way to maximize human well-being.  So Harris upped the ante to clarify what she meant, and suggested as a thought experiment a hypothetical culture that blinded every third child for religious reasons.  She claimed that so long as it was done for religious reasons, it could not be said to be morally wrong.  This is bizarre, but then it really isn't that unusual if you spend any time around humanities scholars.  Seriously.  Those people will say anything, and they are often the lawyers, politicians, and educators who help decide our course as a society.  Cultural relativism is taken as an article of "faith" by many in the academy, and Harris is ruffling a lot of feathers by challenging them from within their own tradition. You seem to find it not particularly revelatory that moral questions could be answered by science, but many people, including many scientists, harbor an unexamined conviction that science ought not to have any opinion whatsoever on questions of morality.  This is precisely why Harris's book is so controversial.  People are not reacting to it merely with yawns and bewilderment at his unoriginality.  They are outraged.  In fact, many people in the atheist community are upset by Harris's book because they prefer to take for granted Gould's notion of "non-overlapping magisteria."  As Gould says, "The net of science covers the empirical universe: what is it made of (fact) and why does it work this way (theory). The net of religion extends over questions of moral meaning and value. These two magisteria do not overlap."  This is the kind of thinking that informs much of the "accomodationist" camp in the internecine debates among atheists.  Harris is calling them out on it. So, no, I don't give much credit to your anxiety that any positive press given to Harris by atheists will be spun by theists as evidence of our groupthink mentality.  (Please.)  
I believe you mean gunblade
fuckin amazing!!
I do see the trees you see!!
I just PMed you keys to bundle 1.
My old corp had something called a Pirate Pad, that you typed up to save all the info on what was what.
Some weeks I have 10-15. I currently haven't drunk anything for about 2-3 weeks due to medication. My family is Dutch, so I'm going to lol at anyone who calls us alcoholics.
Other than I can't pull my car out because its snowed in and the roads are to icey, im good.
so do they just switch everyone's bank account with a certain planned conversion rate overnight?  Or was this something you still had to do manually, or could still trade out after tonight?
Call it morbid curiosity but....pics?
fatheads' headhunter  fatheads' hoppy ending
It needs to be over the usb connection though because I'll be using a bunch in the same area.
I'm really sad that your comment doesn't have more upvotes, and that it has *any* downvotes.
Yeah, Lemmy used to play with Hawkwind before he got kicked out for his love of drugs. In fact, "Motorhead" was the title of [a song](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=p02-77XI1Gs&amp;feature=related) he wrote for them before it was then name of his band.
Hey everyone, this guys thinks he's a comedian or something!!!
Well, he was born at least 4 years after jesus died, so there.
beats a wrist fracture.
Upboat for use of the word "poop"
Godspeed!
I guess in some ways you have to read between the lines and pray on it.
the bottle's a nice touch
Round is a shape! ;-)
She is depressed.   I am serious, I know mothers like this.   She's disassociated from her environment and using the computer as a way of making time go by.  Please approach this from a position of wanting to help her.  She isn't likely to accept your criticism if that is all you get across.   This lifestyle isn't what she wants and it isn't good for the family as a whole, so she needs professional counseling to help.  It's absolutely worth the time and money to get her into counseling.  Talk to her about how much you believe that things can be better, and how you believe that she isn't as "happy as she deserves to be."  Let her speak to you about any grievances she may have.  They aren't relevant at the moment, but it will help for her to have you open to listening before she goes to speak with a professional.  I'm not saying she needs to be medicated, but that she CLEARLY isn't happy with everything and doesn't know how to set things right.  It takes a lot of motivation and organization to be an effective stay-at-home mom.   Please work as a team at getting her back into a healthy mental state, and you'll see a big change.
11: Redtube profit
I was imagining this comic strip all day and then I come home to see it on Reddit. Wow...
Bacon bits is like the fairy dust of bacon. It turns a salad into a game...FIND THE BACON!
Reconsider those loans and become a Resident Assistant instead.  The school will pay YOU to live in the dorms. 
FUCK YOU, DICK.
Happy new year fellow brit.
That is so true, muncher. I'll never forget seeing my first autopsy that same year, as a result of being an EMT. But that's another story for another thread.
&gt; Practical advise from someone who's lived in a car long-term.  http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/byaac/im_25_my_marriage_just_ended_i_have_no_job_and_am/c0p5qkh
Are you the guy that discovered Microsoft was using GNU GPL code in one of their products?
nope. he is an outgoing guy and sharp witted... it's just that I can't see him being a rapper
Why don't people do more of this? 
As an Oklahoman: I apologize.  But not *that* much.
Ask about curry.
Take it apart and oil it all.
Yeah, the quality must be terrible.
Aww. Sad, why the frownie face :( :) 
Newtfags?
Well, la di da, mr fancypants. You probably get to dip it in tomato soup, too, instead of tap water. Does your butler bring it to you?
&gt; So.. not like every single football and celebrity?  I've never seen a football buy an escalade and a mansion =/ That must be one pimp football
I agree that 1 year is way past the point of "one person pays for everything".  FWIW, when MrAnthropic &amp; I were dating, he paid for the first several dates.  However, since I had more spending money than him, I started picking up the tab after 1-2 months into our relationship. I periodically gave him cash so that I would bankroll our meals out, but he was the one physically paying.  That way, it's financially fair, but I still got to feel a bit pampered b/c I didn't have to bother with the bill.
allegedly
very very cool. i had a 50 gallon for years with various varieties. spotted silver dollars are very beautiful mid level fish. what's you opinion on barbs? tiger barbs are little assholes, green barbs are completely opposite
you just been trolled.
/me raises his hand
Nor was he opposed by the Catholic church, or persecuted the Catholic church. It was tolerated and returned the favor.
Might be the plastic bending and twisting.
A couple of months ago I "quit" wow and gave away all my gold to a few lowbies and a couple of random redditors(around 30,000g).  So yes 30g is a lot for me as I started from scratch.  **Edit** And its not just 30g for a bag.  A stack of frostweave is 30g and you need three stack and 12 infinite dust to make 1 bag, so bags are selling for around 110g each.
I am no dubstep historian (from us), but I believe the genre is defined by the tempo. Which has been explained a lot on other threads by people who know more about it than I. As for the wobble, as I see it it's a new sound that people have been playing around with, probably soon (or a while ago) it will have lost its freshness. Then most likely there will be more of a mixture of both styles as well as tangents in very different directions. 
Butt-head from Beavis and Butt-head. 
Funny, I used to work for a Colonel in the US Army who studied how to recruit people (he conceived of and pioneered the [America's Army video game](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/America%27s_army)).  I can tell you that based on all the conversations I've had during the four years I worked for that project it was clear to me that the primary source of recruits come from:  1.  The south 2.  Poor people.  Sounds to me like the op-ed piece you are looking at is pretty much a form of propaganda.
oh, my bad, I must have skimmed over that part.
You see, that statement is so foreign to me. As a child, toys became family to me. Playing with them almost created a sense of security, as if someone was always looking out for you. They were never too busy to play, always ready to cuddle when falling asleep, and didn't care what context they were used in.   I'm often saddened that younger children of this generation haven't been truly exposed to the wonder of toys. It stretched the imagination of a child, unlike most computer games. The child-toy relationship is a beautiful thing, something that Toy Story expresses perfectly in all three movies. God bless Pixar.
One of the most intriguing sci-fi books I've read in years was Transcendent by Stephen Baxter.  Amazon has a good description:  &gt; Michael Poole is a middle-aged engineer in the year of the digital millennium (2047) and Alia is a recognizably human (but evolved) adolescent born on a starship half a million years later. Michael still dreams of space flight, but the world and its possibilities are much diminished due to environmental degradation. The gifted teen has studied Michael's life, for the Poole family played a pivotal role in creating the human future, and thus her world. Through seemingly supernatural apparitions, Alia bridges time to communicate with Michael as they determine the future of humanity.  I won't say it had fantastic character development, but it was such an interesting story and premise that I was caught off guard, especially since I picked it up randomly in a truckstop in the middle of nowhere.
WHAT'S WRONG WITH YOUR FACE?!
You really didn't need to clarify 'from Europe.'  It was quite obvious to me.
The easiest way is to start with a kit - lego mindstorms is pretty good for a start if you're thinking humanoid. There may be clubs in your area. You can check out dprg.org  - that's the Dallas club and what you might look for in your area. Google hackerspaces, robot clubs, etc. If you're in school there are resources there, if you've graduated then you can often offer to supervise/assist the school clubs. Check out Servo and Robot magazines too.  Read a bit, get an idea, try something, make it work - that's the process.  I have a small animatronics company that builds teleoperated robots for museum displays and education. Building the robots is the fun part.
how is this? you were just caught for downloading and they searched your house? that's strange.
I would check out some of the Epicureans, they where the opposing philosophers to the stoics. Lucretius has a poem translated to "On the Nature of Things" that is good. I also highly suggest Bertrand Russell's History of Western Philosophy, even though I haven't finished it. It's comprehensive and covers a lot of different thoughts. I also am a big fan of Camus and enjoy his books as works of philosophy and fiction.  Hope that helps some. 
Meh, who did you expect?
I had a miscarriage in college with a loser boyfriend when it was not the time to have a baby...and I'm STILL getting over it.  It's hard, and I'm so sorry you;re going through this.  My husband and I want to wait for kids for another year or two, but every month I secretly hope for a pregnancy because I'm DYING to know if the pregnancy in college was a fluke or if I have real fertility issues. I can't imagine anything more pressure-filled than trying to conceive, or fertility in general...one thing that really helps a friend of mine and myself is this blog cjanerun.com  The author started it during a bought with unexplained infertility (5 year bought to be precise).  The point was to get everyone off her back who was telling her to "enjoy" this time.  It details her fun life with her husband, and how she's dealing with waiting to get pregnant - spoiler alert - she just had her 2nd in May.  Great musings on marriage and motherhood and waiting.  If not reading it, maybe starting a private blog of your own might help.  Private, anonymous or public.
I think whoever makes decisions to the effect of "we just drove 96 yards from our two-yard-line to their two-yard-line...let's kick a field goal on 4th and inches" needs to go.  And yes, Georgia, as of right now, totally sucks.
lol. Can I have that kid??????
How often do they actually do that?
This doesn't mean the dolphins don't *understand* who's doing it, just that they recognize the symbols.
It's a 30 second video.  there was a 30/30 second chance that it would be at the correct second
"hey what language do you code in?".  "um, I happen to code in the language of the intelligent - NIMROD". Yeah sorry, I do enough dumb shit without choosing a language that is named after a name for a stupid guy. I don't care what the old testent has to say.
I just upvoted both this comment and the submission so others knew about this. I was curious, but never thought to ask here. Good to know.
You should get some history of philosophy books, maybe Bertrand Russell either Problems of Philosophy, or his History of Western Philosophy (which can be found in audiobook format around the internet). Also some of the encyclopedia's of philosophy are really cool, but can be hard to find, and the stanford encyclopedia of philosophy is all on line. There are two other sets of books you might find interesting, the Very Short Introduction series, and the ...for beginners books, which are introductory comic books on various philosophers and philosophies.  Good luck
THE TICK aka Patrick Warburton
I'm going to my uncles for his birthday and some free snacks.  Other than that this is pretty much going to be my night minus the chick.
Just when I thought no one could possibly be that dumb.   "Barbara Ellis, who was a family friend and landlord to Code, told CTV Toronto that he was an avid fan of the Outdoor Life Network show "Survivorman."  "He wouldn't miss a program," she said."
She said no to the $300 and offered me $100.  She then told me that $100 was because she liked me because I was a good tenant.  I have called on numerous occasions asking for an itemized list.  I did so because of what she did to a former tenant.  It was only when I quoted Arkansas Landlord/Tenant law that she call me back. I gave the customary 30 days notice and left her my forwarding address.  I wanted to do everything by the book so she didn't have any reasons to complain.  
Thats why on some mac keyboards, instead of anything at all, it just says ⌫. Move left and X
I got the same expression from dying my own hair. They act like I shouldn't do it because it damages my hair but then go on and on about how thick and healthy my hair is.
It's a matter of grammar; the clause before the comma is merely explanatory. If it was intended to mean that the "right of a well-regulated militia to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed" I think we can assume it would have said that.  There are a couple of issues beyond the simple meaning of the words. One is that you could now apply the rule to everything up to nukes. However, it's probably reasonable to assume that it should at least be read to cover weapons similar in function and use to those available at the time - pistols and long-arms.  Finally, there's a separate issue of whether you think that a right to bear arms is a good idea at all. 
Man, lots of Aoki haters.  I like the guy, he's entertaining :)  However, that was an awesome knee.
super masturbation boy
Not to mention his clutch hand-placement.
Excellent! I have also worked for Ken as a DOI employee.
Says the millionaire. 
Yes. Japan is mountainous island surrounded by warm seas. When moist air comes to inland and raises up mountains it rains heavily. When temperature is below zero Celsius, it comes all down as snow.  - http://msnbcmedia.msn.com/j/msnbc/Components/Photos/060109/060109_japan_snow_vlrg_6a.widec.jpg - http://www.nytimes.com/imagepages/2006/01/09/international/09japanCA02ready.html - http://www.cbc.ca/world/story/2006/01/08/japan-snow-060108.html - http://my.opera.com/Mathilda/albums/showpic.dml?album=71783&amp;picture=897512
I'm crashing at a friend's house but I want to say thank you for offering this to the community. That's a pretty awesome thing to do.
All DVD remotes have been spirited away by space ghosts.
Most detailed IAmA ever.
Friends help you move, real friends help you move bodies.
Bucky Balls... ewwww....  Should have gotten ZenMagnets
Yes, so stop posting codes in plaintext!  Why on Earth people want to gift extra licenses to cheaters and trolls is beyond me.  Do something creative to gift randomly, or gift to people who are deserving and skint!
I wasn't complementing your age, I was insulting your intelligence. Seriously, how did you not get that?  As Forest Gump said "stupid is as stupid does."  ^see what I did there?
no it is stupid, but not something to worry about. It is common practice in heavily religious areas (bible belt nebraska) to enact the backwards laws to preserver morals and other bullshit.  Unless your friend is buying that liquor for al queada you don't really have anything to worry about.
poor guy and poor portland
No shit!  Although I think most of Europe, in fact more likely the entire world, has completely run out of this mystical substance called Liberty.
Actually, this is a good idea.  If he wants to file a report, all his official shit will come out.
I just threw up
Don't forget to brush it with butter just before it is finished
Global Warming is what it was called in the 1970s, before all the discoveries that have happened since that have helped us understand it better, which is why we know call it "climate change".
This is the one that I hear about the most, and the one the aforementioned fanboys are most ravenous about.  The thing is, I think Cloud's going all emo for two discs over Aeris dying would annoy the fuck out of me
lol, once after I had picked up a pizza, I got in my car &amp; was about to leave when a woman drove in front of my parking space &amp; just nonchalantly tossed a tray of half-eaten food out her window like it was nothing. The woman driving behind her had this :O look on her face &amp; looked at me &amp; we shared a comical WTF moment. 
It has been said that there is a fine line between balls and stupidity.  I think we're waaaaaaaaaay past balls at this point, far into the latter category.
Do what freddiew did. He [hid the code](http://i.imgur.com/jl0bz.png) inside a screenshot of Minecraft. There's no way that could be scraped.
wow thats great!  Canada has done things a little like that but probably not to the extent of what you are describing.  Too bad lots of governments are too afraid of 'socialism' to try some of those ideas
You're just pissed that I beat you too it.  :-)
Canada? Australia? New Zealand?
Posting an image lets us read the headline, and not much else.  Why even bother?
Going up?
The name fits the man.
*It's never perfect, it asks, it begs for perfection, I can never satisfy its lust. I'm never perfect, it just pops and laughs at me. Laughs and laughs and laughs at me.*
I think you're the one not thinking here. You've decided that because people might be offended something shouldn't happen. You're the one being PC, I'm saying do it anyway.
I second this. I think I'm going to be looking into Mistborn.
This isn't as true as you might think. Some guys honestly have obscenely high urges to fuck women who aren't their gf. And when a hot girl aggressively comes on to you morality can become malleable very quickly. But masturbating eliminates that irrational rationalization  
Honestly fuck Harper, that decision is best described by [Rick Mercer](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=l3zJ26SNT3g)
Like I said, I don't like those players either. I don't want a kid on my team who's trying to get montage clips. All I'm saying is in the context of a montage it doesn't really make a lot of sense to criticize the players for not playing the objective. I agree it would be better if she played in TDM or something, but from her perspective it makes sense not to. She's trying to get "l33t scopz" and an easy way to do that is play a game mode where all the scrubs on the other team will be blindly charging towards an objective.  Don't get me wrong, I think the game would be better without people like this muddying up the objective playlists. Just sort of playing devil's advocate.
I edited it because it wasn't quite the question I wanted to ask.
Print note to self; forever alone.
I HAD plans, but I'm sure she bailed. If She doesn't get in touch with me soon enough, I'm heading out to Ground Kontrol. Send me a message with what you'll be wearing or something and I'll look out for you.
No, I have the utmost pity for y'all. It's a shame. I don't really know why they don't expand it, if it's an infrastructure thing or what. Sorry mang. Guess it's your fault for being born outside the US, LOL. No, just kidding. I'd trade my Google Voice account not be there instead of here.  :(
You should have posted in the r\acidflashback section. Your sentence make not sense.
How does a guy (or a girl I suppose) go about sucking on a clitoris? I feel that it is too recessed for me to really suck on it without my teeth getting in the way and hurting my girlfriend.
Yeah. Well. I pretty much have. I see her only at events at which we have mutual friends (1-2 per year). I don't talk to her outside of those.
he did - it was subtle - watch it again
you'll notice the advantages almost immediately 
Yes, they should write an entire physics engine and then apply it only to capes.  Genius. You should apply at Blizzard.
This (and the Urban Operations expansion) accounted for most of the modding I did during my early teenage years. I played the hell out of this game.
"Not a bad choice." he says.  It's more like; "Excellent choice Master Goldstein."
There are 3 more pages for you to analyze!
WOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!
What was done to the Jews during WWII would count as an "Unlawful Order" in the US Military. Soldiers are not permitted to execute civilians and can lawfully (according to the UCMJ) refuse to follow such an order.  What is happening right now is not comparable to the extermination of the Jews in WWII. There are civilian casualties (which happens in any war) and there have been some scandals for which people were punished (which happens in any war).  You don't want our soldiers to kill people, stop having wars.
War wasn't declared so that nobody could be declared guilty of war crimes, duh.  Welcome to the war of words front line.
I don't like drinking much either, but I prefer to hang out with a bunch of the hottest chicks in the world... and if it weren't for alcohol, they wouldn't be the hottest chicks in the world.
What is this "sweater incident" referred to in the article?
One scenario:  A doctor makes money when people come to see him. He can make people more likely to see him by saying things that saying things that his patients find useful. i.e. the doctor is selling himself.
so you dug them out and took them to work with you!?!?
"as it happened the ball hit the net, but it just might be an entry as to how hard can you strike a football, because he just levelled it"
Cool suggestions, I'll have to give those a shot, thanks :-)   Thanks for the compliment! I actually gave the water color to my mom because she asked for it. I thought she was going to put it on the fridge like I was in kindergarten, but she framed it and hung it up. I was surprised. 
Barney Stinson style:  Legend... wait for it... dary!
plus he could stand to lose 50 lbs.
MTV hasn't been good since the mid 80s with nina blackwood, mark Goodwin,  etc.
Adding this sentence to your original post would have helped immensely so yes, I get what you are saying.  "Judge not lest ye be judged"  Thanks for the reminder...you have no fucking clue what the other person is/has gone through, so don't be haste to make judgement.
especially the 3rd movie. I could barely watch that shit beacuse of the unsteady camera movement. drove me batty
http://www.google.com/search?q=define%3A+book  Books are tangible, printed objects. I understand what you are saying, but technically, those are not books.
&gt; I see you don't ride subways very often  &gt; Or a young black man...  Why did you assume he doesn't ride young black men often? How dare you?
Like the author said:   "*the San Diego area's dynamic food and beer scene sings most sweetly along the city's 30th Street Corridor."*  I don't know too much about the slow-food movement but I do know the craft beer scene and San Diego [County] is definitely one of the leaders, if not the leader, in the US.
with the exception of folk, i'd estimate late twenties is the ceiling that MOST industry guys and gals endorse for those genres.
No, not really. Pol Pot remains a curious case -- just like Mao Zedong, it's difficult to separate the "evil" from blinkered idealistic agrarian policies. For example, this sentence is very weaselly:   &gt;The combined effect of slave labour, malnutrition, poor medical care and executions is estimated to have killed around 2 million Cambodians (approximately one third of the population).  "Estimated", "approximately one third"... and note that the executions -- which were really the core of Pol Pot's evil -- are just tossed in there with malnutrition and medical care which may or may not have been directly caused by Khmer Rouge policies. If we're ranking evil by body count, then Pol Pot's ranking certainly deserves closer scrutiny. 
Scrap metal?
My opinion is that the information is mostly irrelevant, and no where describes any "crimes against humanity." I wonder how so many froth-mouths are so quick to conclude otherwise, or make it the central issue. What incident are you referring to? (Spain &amp; Germany) I'd like to read more. 
looks delicious
I am also pigmentally challenged, but I gots no flow
Touché Monsieur puzzy gat!
I would love it. Thanks a lot. &lt;3
Have they always been mediocre with him?  I didn't think they were mediocre during his two Sugar Bowl wins.
Especially considering this note for "future" implementation in Nimrod:  &gt; closures and anonymous procs  He really couldn't have been more wrong about it being like Perl. It doesn't even have closures!
Must be an archaeology student judging from all the artefacts in that pic. 
I have tf2 and like you all my friends have it too, except one, she's new to steam (i gave her for christmas a humble bundle and registered the keys)   And my favorite childhood game is pilotwings for the n64 
This makes me rage.
HOLLA! Congrats!
dressing up as an annoying raver kid and going to King Cat. :D
The combines look like the Slurm guy from Futurama
Both of my salvia experiences felt like I was falling repeatedly into reality, almost like a rollercoaster.
I never understood that "all glory to God" bit. What glory is there to be had for God on Earth?
HOVER HAND
Everyone should come to Sydney, it rocks here!
I sure as hell vote yes!
I once pulled up to a red light in the summer with my windows down and "Fuck the police" playing on a pretty loud volume. Across the street there was two cop cars dealing with some dude that they pulled over. As I'm sitting there waiting for it to turn green, chillin', listening to my music I'm watching them do their shit. At the time, I was kinda confused as to why one of the cops gave me a dirty look. I am not a clever man.
verybut there is one vlass left
with what currency would you pay taxes? why wouldn't the market just default to whatever you pay taxes with?  /economics newb
sweet hair brah
I would LOVE this. I'm sick of drinking and don't really do it anymore, but I miss my crazy beers.
Okay, I see the edit. I struggle a little with the premise still. I mean, Pratchett's "Small Gods" is a brilliant satire of religion on one level, but the fictional world is one where gods and belief are factual. It's hard to know if a parent wanting an "atheist-approved" list would be okay with it.  The same goes for the Earthsea trilogy, which I rate highly as a set of novels about personal growth and coming to understand responsibility but is obviously set in a world where magic exists.
Actually, this is why democracy is fail. 50%+1 victimize the other 49%. It's two wolves and a sheep voting on what's for dinner. I am a proud and conscientious non-voter.
Oerba Dia Vanille is my favourite character. Gorgeous :3
Care to site your sources?  :D
This is a tough row to hoe.  Below is a list of open source medical software.  It reflects a wide range of applications.  While I use Ubuntu at home, Red Hat is the only way to go in business right now IMHO. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_open_source_healthcare_software  *Thoughts to ponder:*  * **Conversion Costs** It sounds like you are in a relatively small shop.  I am basing this on your not using a web client with a central server.  It sounds like everybody is running fat stand alone clients.  Is that the case?  Anyway, I think you need an assessment of what it would take to switch medical software applications.  Even if you went the open source route, it will take time and materials to do a conversion.  Like others have said, I would not consider running anything under WINE.  * **Red Hat &amp; Open Source Replacement** -- Do any of the open source replacements have conversion experience with your current software?  References please?   * **Red Hat** -- They are big boys and are now part of the S&amp;P 500. * **Business Case** -- I would ask for a business case of total cost of ownership.  I would include risks of records being corrupted or stolen from a compliance and reputational risk perspective.  Some of the numbers will be easily quantifiable -- other won't.  But a "numbers" approach -- I would think -- would be a necessary part of the case. 
[](/omg)
I opened my curtains a few inches to see the fireworks, thats the most they've been opened in a while.  I would, but I'm broke so I'll just enjoy some wine in my own company and play a game maybe.
sorry man.  i had to put my dog down about a month ago.  it really sucks.
Well, everybody else thinks so. You guys just lost to a Conference USA team. When was the last time you won a BCS bowl game?
of course, gotta savor it with the vape!
I'm in MS too with the wonderful weather
&gt;also aoe farming with 0 mana doesnt sound like the best idea   yea it isn't but it is possible. (you trade gripping for a quick farm journey which ends in pool)  &gt;it gives armor as well  +3 Armor  I would suggest Ring of the Teacher which provides your allies:   +3 Armor   +0.65 Mana Regeneration   again ring of sorcery shouldn't be taken for yourself but for your teammates, you can get BloodChalice+Ring of the Teacher for 125g cheaper... Ring of Sorcery provides    4mana/s if you were to use it every time it's of cooldown   BloodChalice+Ring of the Teacher    3,5mana/s -2,2health/s if you were to use it every time it's of cooldown
It's on Netflix too
1. B/c of all the positive comments from redditors 2. B/c of penny-pinching to pay back student loans and interest. 3. I really enjoyed TMNT3: The Manhattan Project!
Tube site.  Not reddit or anything like that.
Wow! Thanks for enlightening me. That's cool stuff; my point-and-shoot, as far as I can tell, lacks almost all of that stuff! I would still say that a dSLR is *significantly* better for learning about photography, but those controls you mentioned sure would make a huge difference.
Apparently you can finish SoC in a few hours if you only follow the main plot... but in a game so full of atmosphere, why would you? I clocked over eighty hours before hitting the end of my first playthrough, just because I was enjoying the world so much.
My current GPU is slightly damaged, but I've found that turning on vsync or limiting the fps keeps it happy.
A Tribe Called Quest, Public Enemy, Brother Ali, Kool Keith, MF DOOM are a few that you should listen to. You can't tell me those guys aren't crazy talented. Fuck, even Kanye West, as popular as he is, is a genius. Have you heard My Beautiful Dark Twisted Fantasy yet? It's fucking awesome, I promise.
upvoted
Best for cooking chicken. I wouldn't actually drink the stuff.
Wow. I'm sorry you had to deal with that guy, what a tool. Don't judge all web designers though, they aren't all bad.
good thinking!
Well I always thought religion wasn't a big deal in California or the north eastern states. Most Americans I've met were from California and were atheists.
Maybe so one or both parties can [say "fiance"](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ghCTZF61ey0) for a couple years.
?
Best game ever, I think I spent more of my life playing this game than not playing it
I understand this, but why, several days later can I clearly hear a line from the movie, in the actors voice, in English.  He wasn't speaking English, I have never heard him speak English to even guess how he would phrase or pronounce things.
I *wish* there was win trading on my server.  Apparently the Horde on my server are still pissed about hardly ever winning Wintergrasp...
Also need some more Aussies to hit /r/bfbc2au so I can find people to play with.
So your solution to the problem with youtube is paying for youtube? That defeats the whole point of youtube in the first place. Are you as old as you say you are? You have very little understanding on how business works. That sort of nonsense would not succeed, at all. Go ahead and design a website that requires users to pay to upload their video. Come back when you are raking in thousands. Also not once did I say Google could not afford it. 
4chan fag
look at all the arrogant hipsters in this thread. shame on you all.
Why is *she* taking *you* on as a responsibility? If anything, you're taking her on. She's not adopting you. Basically, anything anyone says about their "place in life" or their "outlook on relationships," etc. is horseshit. Nobody knows a goddamn thing about their place in life, and every relationship is different. So I think you were just LJBFed, that's all.
Well said...
Makes sense, I guess. But if it's empty, you might as well check it, because they're sure as hell not gonna let you carry a can of butane on.
Honestly, i think i drive better when drunk.  I focus a lot better
Go out and get drunk the other 364 days of the year and leave this one to the amateurs
I have been on lakes like this after they've frozen but before the first snow fall (once it snows, the ice gets cloudy and the surface a little bumpy).  It's magic.  The ice is smooth and clear and you really can't even see anything beneath your feet, so it's almost like floating.  The ice can be that clear and you're just up there upon a floating void.  The ice skating in our lake was amazing, up to 12 miles in some directions and nothing but clear, smooth ice.  You can see right through the ice, it's like glass.  I could see fish swimming beneath and ripples in the sand.  Once you got out into deeper water (i.e. &gt; 5 feet), is when you got that floating feeling.  My mom has some photos when ice skating where the ice has turned into a rainbow in the sun.  Unbelievable.  Also, the ice sings.  When it expands, it sounds like a cross between a humpback whale and a piece of sheet metal.  No kidding.  The ice will start to sing as soon as the sun goes below the trees and will keep it up all night, so loud that you can hear it in the house sometimes.  It only occurs when the ice is a certain thickness, so when the lake is freezing over, up to say 12-15" and then in the spring at the ice starts to thin, but still refreezes at night.  This picture brings back a lot of winter memories.  I wish I still lived on that lake.
Its a rather old study that says it is worse for the environment, also done by someone looking to discredit ethanol. I havent done much arguing online in the last year or so, I got away from the  "I cant sleep right now, someone on the net is wrong" mentality, so I dont have all the links and studies handy. With a bit of looking around I could dig some up though. Lately I gave up on arguing for doing. I figured its easier to prove something by doing it than by arguing about it online. I came in here only because its winter and I dont feel like working in the shop right now.
I like you. Mint green tea is awesome. Green tea in general is awesome. 
Urgh. Game to movie adaptations are always shit. Listen to VicePresidente instead, much better film, and cheaper than any COD game out there.
That's not the kind of person who aspires to become a cop.  People who want to swagger around with a gun and badge and mirror shades are commonly very insecure and prone to bullying others weaker than themselves.
Graveyard of the Firefly's is exactly what your looking for. I **highly** recommend it.
"The friend said Mr Jefferies was an admirer of French culture and bought a house in the Dordogne in 1995." He really is done now!
I agree Crash is one of most notoriously crappy movies of the decade. It was so fucking awful
I hope that musical ADD included Devin Townsend!
He's probably talking about the [New Yankee Workshop episode Table Saw 101](http://www.newyankee.com/getproduct.php?0708). 
I've heard good things about the Microsoft LifeCam Pro (I think that's the name) and the logitec 9000 pro (also uncertain of exact name).
Thank you very much for the reply! I was hoping for that sort of specific feedback.  Outside of Starcraft 2, any games I've been playing are console. I figure sometime in the future I might find some games that I'd want the additional power and then I can upgrade, but for now it seems like I might as well save money. Is there that much of a performance increase with the card you mentioned that I might as well throw I'm thirty more bucks?
Good advice. Also, peanut butter.
i want to respond to this - giving it thought...
&gt;Because. New Zealand is in the future.  It's funny because NZ is still decades behind the rest of the world.
I stopped reading at ...  &gt; Anarchists define "private property" ...  First of all, that's generalization.  Second of all, they're using the term anarchist in a very specific sense -- the radical, I'm crazy and want to destroy banks kind of way.  Private property is perfectly enforceable in a society without the violent organization known as the state.
New Jersey?
If you're arguing on the internet about whether you're living in *1984*, you're not living in *1984*
[relevant](http://xkcd.com/37)
Not again!
It's on my bucket list and my goal is to cross off 3 items from it this year.
man if the shoe fits, it's worth two in the bush.
doesn't it get comment karma?  Do you realize what he could do with all that comment karma? 
&gt; considering you need to find and install all the drivers  Apparently you've never used windows.
Email him a pizza roll if you like his webzone.  Seriously though, watch the SW:TPM review. He by far the best film critic I've ever seen. 
Grrr, not in my region apparently. 
Your kids will grow up wishing they could have had holographic float screen videos, instead of crappy 1080p.  
At this point Minecraft is more of a toy than a game, if that makes sense.
he got better
yeah i know the feeling, i watchinga videogame cutscene of soming dying earlier  peace be upon you
What a Douche!, sorry
Yes.  There is no feasible way to regret it, especially since it is on sale at this very moment.
I use instant yeast, rather than active-dried. You can buy a pound of it at Whole Foods or on Amazon, I think. I refrigerate a small amount and freeze the rest. Instant yeast is technically still alive, I think, so it doesn't need to be proofed like active dried. I'd highly suggest it.
Being an American, fuck yeah!!!  [Relevant](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sWS-FoXbjVI)
Hey, we can clone people.
NSFL
Politician wife face = stepford + plastic work + plus open your eyes, it'll make you look younger.
I forgot that everyone in the music industry is an executive. 
I'm a bit reluctant to be specific, just because of CLC's uber need for privacy at all times, but I'll say that it's one of the centre is in melbourne's east.  where did you volunteer? did you experience the same (generally) friendly and supportive atmosphere?
I'm everywhere.  -Sent from my iPhone.
hum... but what does that OpenCL support add to john the ripper?
How about "sapient?"
As of 6 minutes ago It is now officially 2011 here in the UK, and I can hear fireworks going off.  Have a great new year.
I love how everyone needs a scape goat for why their choice (or teams choice) didn't make it.  It must be Americans! They hate MY favorite goal/team!
To someone who doesn't know about challenge accepted, it looks like they just all of a sudden start 'tarding out on each other.
My wife made this for me and it is most tasty.
That droid is just a scout.
I know what you mean, man. That place amazes me with the degree of volatility (to reuse a word you've used) present in many of it's neighborhoods.  But, I assume you also are aware of the beauty it [once] possesses. I know you've heard all the babble already:  *It's capitol was once called the "Paris of the Middle East" for it's beauty. *It is a booming tourist spot, and has a world-renown international university. *Called the #1 Tourist Place to Visit by New York Times  Yet, despite all that, it IS craziness that you can still acquire an AK-47  easier than acquiring a gun license here in the US...
I could be wrong, but from what I understand, different Muslim sects each have a different opinion on Jesus.
I tried it at a display counter, thinking it would be a gift from god and it drew and erased just like one of those cheap old erasable pens.
i'm with you OP.  It's good, but not really near the top of my list.  It's too salty.
You evil person are forcing me to learn more and more. Before this post, I had never even heard of Kantianism or KH. What my buddy Sam Harris is proposing and which I'm somewhat ineptly championing sounds more like UH.  TIL lotsa stuff. Thanks again!
Very well thought out. Very insightful. Thank you!
firefox 3.6.13 it full screened (not cool, at work) and had a couple of pop ups.
Guess it would be a lot funnier if the person replying wasn't the same person who wrote the warning. 
Soooo... best possible case is that you have 30% chance of getting herpes?  Is this over a year of regular sex or is this every instance?
If they're breaking the law, no.
Jeez, did they forget about the Warner/Faulk years? Those guys were utterly electrifying and that is still a recent memory.
only assholes throw books away.
came here to say the same thing.... =( 
same. have a nasty cold. staying home, drinking, and watching the twilight zone marathon on syfy.
HEY LOOK EVERYBODY, THIS GUY HAS ECSTASY. 
Nice try, the closest the South Side East of State street gets to Englewood, Austin, Lawndale, etc. is the wild 100's, and even then it is no comparison.  
Yes, that is exactly what it does. I think it has been part of iTunes for eight years. I'm looking at Clementine thanks to this thread but man, it makes you wonder.
I spent years saving money and now I'm semi-retired at 29 years of age. A lot of people would spend their money but for me, my freedom from the workforce is the only thing I want to spend my money on. 
So pretty much thousands of people are standing there all day for 1 minute at 11:59pm? 
What's so bad about Oblivion Lost?
I just modified iTunes to allow FLAC files, I don't remember where I found the tutorial, but it must've been pretty easy as I'm not great at that stuff (I'm also a Mac user)  EDIT: jdtl remembers - Fluke is what it's called.
You are what makes Christians look bad.  You say that your religion is true because the bible says it's truth. That's exactly the same as me saying that the Jedi are truth because the Star Wars trilogy says Jedi is real. If you can't see this, you are a moron.
Gott nytt år Kanada, thihihihi
I don't see this thread enough, i think once every week isn't enough.
Out of curiosity, does just watching the ads help, or do I need to click on them in order for it to count?
There is places that they can go. You are good my friend.
Happy new year from Europe, it is 2011 here. Still no flying cars in the future!!!
Do you keep contact with his family?
twins? i mean the 2 babes
Purchase or download a free copy of "When I Say No, I Feel Guilty" by Manuel J. Smith, read it carefully, and practice each of the seven methods. It has served me well many years.
&gt;Kreig, director of the D.C.-based Justice Integrity Project  nothing credible there of course &gt;says the Assange arrest in Sweden has many of the hallmarks of the Siegelman case. And he notes that Rove has strong ties to Swedish prime minister Fredrik Reinfeldt, who has been called "the Ronald Reagan of Europe. hardly anything worth looking into, of course. You said  &gt;Once spent a couple of years They were the last two, spinmeister... &gt;Rove has advised Swedish Prime Minister Fredrik Reinfeldt for the past two years after resigning as Bush White House political advisor in mid-2007. &gt;"This all has Karl's signature," a reliable political source told me a week and a half ago in encouraging our Justice Integrity Project to investigate Rove's Swedish connection. "He must be very happy. He's right back in the middle of it. He's making himself valuable to his new friends, seeing the U.S. government doing just what he'd like " – and screwing his opponents big-time." But, Jesus Christ people, Reddit is only for consumers of concluded investigations.
Needs to keep the rust off his lathe!
Anyone else just watch this 30 times hoping for a couple more frames tacked on at the end?
Well they said they would be finished 2 years ago. It makes you wonder whether they actually thought they had it closed to finished or wanted to hype themselves up. My problem with the devs is that on the surface they seem to care more about publicity and fan loyalty then quietly finishing what they started. *shrug*
Anything that isn't Century.
It's Australia, everything can kill you.
Flash on PPC might be a problem.
He **imagines** that the people you are fucking are not homeless.
Blitzen Trapper
UGA sucks, A.J. Green doesn't.
he made the mistake of going to /b/ which is filled with penniless cynical retards
:) OMFG when I read it my first impulse was to jump in and do a "They were coming right at me!"; I can't believe the source beat me to it.
I was just thinking the same thing... haven't played hon in a while, maybe I can go noob it up.
I decided to re-watch Hitchhiker's Guide after reading this.
downvoted for not being racist enough
Good luck with that. I'm in my 20's and still close friends with the 10 people I have known since I was 13. It's a mixed group. Guys and girls. If someone breaks up with one of us and tries to take our friends, we tell them to fuck off.
It is twenty eleven. I wish people would call it that.
I just can't resist these thigh high athletic socks.  
What's not?
I apologize, as I didn't think anyone would take that seriously. I was joking--just a quick, off the cuff, internet remark. Just to be clear: I have a decent job, 3 kids, and a wife that isn't willing to move to Korea.  I am not going back to school. I did find the video hilarious, though.  And I would love to have a bunch of Korean kids to tease. 
Smilies make everything okay.
Last I checked a year is 365. Date begins after opening...kind of like opening a can of spam.
It was always a pain to set up! Loved to play it anyway!!
Yeah you shoudl defintiely upgrade the video card. If needed, get a 945 or 955 Phenom II or an Athlon II x4.
Once the MG Big Zam goes into mass production...
I upvoted.... Do you have a limit on how many you're giving away?
&gt; Please don't:   * Plead for votes in the title of your submission. ("Vote This Up to Spread the Word!", "If this makes the front page, I'll adopt this stray cat and name it Reddit" etc.)  &gt;  Second off, no, its not
I just sent a1up a key for bundle 1 so hopefully he will vouch I'm not trolling. 
Eh, I'll allow it.
Could be they're scared you're going to stab someone. We have a bit of a knife crime problem at the moment. Also,  please be careful pulling your knife out. The police might not appreciate it too much. 
Oh my god. I was the short redhead getting annihilated. I think I know who you were!   And I wish I was going tonight; one night is all that's in my budget :/
downvoted because this is stupid.  Also - I have a giant box of legos - fuck minecraft! 
My Internet-savvy friend yesterday told me he never heard of the term "fap," much less "schlick." Also, it seems that "fap" is the preferred term for women over "schlick." Reddit-gone-wild women use "fap" almost exclusively.
I think what's most hilarious about this is that there's Republicans actually ragequitting CPAC because of this.
I'll head over around 10 or so. Their artichoke sandwich is my favorite thing ever, so I'll definitely be having nosh! 
You can just google Dawes rolls, and you should get some results that allow you to search them. That's how I found it at least! I don't know how reliable those searches are, but they're a start. If that doesn't work, try to get in touch with the Cherokee nation. (Now, this I don't have any idea about. I only know my local tribes, and none of them are Cherokee.)
Im going to GK...if you see an older lady rockin the Ms PacMan come over and say hi.
What i've found, is that if you offer a bribe for the person with the highest healing recieved from lightwell + the lowest overhealing, it tends to get eaten rather quickly =]
I'll drink to the first thug cop that ends up eating his gun from getting doxed.
Why do people want others to pay for their internet usage habits?  Usage based billing allows for the heavy users to pay more, which theoretically means that light users can pay less.   I say this knowing that I can hit 100+ gbs in one night downloading.   At the end of the day, I am the one putting the strain on the network. 
Alright, then what's [this one](http://couponcravings.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/09/smuckers-jam.jpg) on the left?
1. I want it because I dont have any steam games. 2. I havent gotten it because I cant afford to waste any money on games. 3. My favorite childhood game was halo 1.  P.S. **Your awesome for doing this for strangers!**
There's a difference between sarcasm and cynicism.
Have an upboat on a refuge from Feminisms/Women.
People who can fall asleep in less than an hour or so, at appropriate times of the night.  People who can breathe effectively while running.  People who don't need glasses to see.  If you are all of the above, you're a freaking machine.
Mind -&gt; blown. 
Even if you haven't played the game this one is great.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HXXiwSf-onA
Damn, that is freaky.
i experienced the same problem.  My ghetto workaround is to include multiple instances of Glitch and automate the 'enabled/disabled' toggle.  Or it might have been the mix knob, could be either one, or both.  I do use Glitch quite a bit nowadays - even for relatively 'benign' uses.  I tend to have multiple instances with each instance 'simplified' where it only engages a single effect with a single pattern.  I create automation patterns to toggle each instance and score out the glitchiness in the ... urh... pattern score thingy, I'll have patterns like 'FX MidSyn Shuff On' and 'FX MidSyn Shuff Off', or whatever.  So [here's proof in the pudding](http://soundcloud.com/james_filter/that-new-sound-9-fix-64/s-bWaXd).  You'll notice the 'bed track' is just version 9, but I made an additional 64 versions to try to figure out how to successfully automate Glitch.  It's not a particularly good track but you'll be familiar with the Glitchiness.
I just think most women think giving bj's is beneath them. When it comes to pleasuring yourself and others, the more you indulge them, the more they will indulge you.  I will never waste my time on a sexually uptight woman again. I have/will find an adventurous one that has already learned the fun of mutual pleasure.
Errr... No.. No they don't.
WINNAR!
I believe Octopus might already be plural(much like deer), although I could be wrong.
Thanks, you should see it tonight! :P
Start with Code Complete 2, and the Pragmatic Programmer books. Then, choose a language that fits your needs.  The language should adjust to your requirements.
me id love a copy, been trying to get one forever lol :P  wvmatt1298@gmail.com
I can dig it.
That's gotta seal Andrew Luck's fate if he decides to declare. New coach, new QB. Almost every time.  So who are the possible candidates again? Anybody with ties to the GM/owners who are without a job as of right now?
Barefoot Bandit? He can't be that infamous, I don't believe I've ever heard that name.
Let me be the first to tell you that the table looks nice and OUCH!   That made my finger hurt.  It seems that you would qualify to teach wood shop now though.   I have never seen a shop teacher with all of their fingers.
just barely. why do you think its thin? held my weight just fine.
Thanks for this. You're a new hero of mine.
Because no one gives a damn about how subjectively awesome your dad is.  
Yeah I thought they changed that, though maybe it was a state thing or only applies to giftcards you pay money for, etc.  Though I know I got a giftcard like 2 years ago for $25 and I just used it the other week for the entire $25, so shrug.
You've been answering my questions for me, but let me post this. My source for ticks is my own experience. You have no experience being without shoes, so who's the confused one? Regarding the carpet, I've told you, every house I've entered hasn't cared one way or the other. So simply put, if someone asked me to put something on, I would. I'm not rude. But personally, I'd rather have a barefoot come in on my white carpet, as opposed to having someone that regularly wears shoes taking them off and having that stink in my carpet. I don't argue with people about the rules regarding their own homes. That, again, would be rude. I do feel being barefoot is superior, and that shoes, like gloves, are a tool. Would you wear gloves all day long? I think not. If I were hot-mopping a roof I'd wear shoes. You've pretty much ignored or neglected to respond to my positions on why it IS superior. I've even left things on the table and waited for the obvious questions of why I think that shoes are physically bad for you, but no questions were forthcoming. I thought I explained the "you people" remark. No offense was intended. I was simply saying that because I've run into several people who were, like I said before, misinformed. One last thing.....you did ignore what I said about bare feet being clean, about the only thing sticking to my feet was the stray wet piece of grass. If you live in the San Diego area, feel free to drop by the house. It's clean and funny enough, I'm something of a clean freak. Oh well. 
This belongs in r/circlejerk.
It's a primarily Northern European style of artwork and generally refers to a style of art pertaining to the meaninglessness of life. Here are a few examples:  http://www.humanflowerproject.com/index.php/weblog/comments/vanitas_mocafico_the_masters_old_and_young/  It's one of my favorite styles.
My wife's sister.
Explain.
I think it's upwards of 200%
New fiance and I are not going out so we can fuck into the new year
Cocaine.
The groups that produce this ridiculousness may be on the radical side, but the people that buy into the message are not always that radical. Way more then half (and if I were to guess I would put the % in the 80's) of the self described Christian family members/co workers/friends I know, have some degree of this belief. Many of them outright admit that they hear it directly from their church leadership.   Just because you are not actively attacking environmentalism does not also mean that you are not a part of a large opposition. If that opposition is because direct result of a religious association,  as xexers has pointed out, this then opens your religious beliefs to attack....even if you personally did not agree with the attack on environmentalism.   Christians (and all religious sects), are going to have to start taking responsibility for the destructive ideals that are prevalent and perpetuated via their belief system. We are not talking about a small minority here, we are talking about a large majority. "The ability for me to swing my arms around ends at the tip of your nose". I would consider the future of my home and my children's home is more detrimental then just a punch in the face. 
How do you know someone uses Arch Linux? They'll tell you. 
&gt; Ellsberg’s position is not only principled. It also **correctly** identifies the political motivations of those who are now attacking Assange and participating in the international campaign of persecution and defamation directed against him.   Phew!  I'm glad he doesn't **incorrectly** identify the political motivations of those attacking Assange!  That would be tragic.
I remember reading somewhere its a under river tunnel in Moscow that has a flawed design and black ice forms from leaks on the occasion it drops below freezing. Also, that bus driver is total pro. He got it back.
But his dad didn't receive benefits. None. That was already determined.
If you watched the movie, you'd know it was Linux based not Windows.
Nope, plain old Sawfish with Cairo-compmgr, so not sure how much of a difference that would make
&gt; I didn't really miss class on purpose, overslept a lot  This is missing class on purpose.  Get an alarm clock.  Get two if you have to.  If you are in grad school, you should be old enough to be able to get up on time.
No, there aren't tons of nerves in your follicles that only work when there is hair.  Your hair simply acts as a lever to more strongly conduct kinetic energy to the nerves already present in your skin.  While it does allow greater detection of lesser stimulus, it's not due to nerves in your follicles.
And believe it or not the US killed civilians during Vietnam, the Korean War, WWII, WWI, the Spanish American War, the Civil War, Mexican American war, the War of 1812 and the American Revolution.  It might not seem possible, but civilians die in wars.  Its also might be hard to believe but other countries outside of the US also have killed civilians.  I know it blows the mind that when artillery shells, rifle rounds, grenades and rockets are going of that they are not set up to only kill combatants.  As to killing a hell of a lot innocent civilians as you state, you have to look at the context and when it occurred.  Was there an artillery round that went astray and hit a building during the war?  What about the clearing of Faluah?  Then you have to ask yourself about the Sunni and Shiite death squads that are actually killing a hell of a lot of innocent civilians in Iraq.  Whose the bigger threat? Americans now acting as police or religious idiots whose going out and systematically slaughtering people who wear the wrong hat?  Trust me, I'd rather see all Americans immediately pulled out of Iraq as of yesterday.  However the sectarian bloodbath that would result makes that an impossibility.  If there is one thing a Muslim hates more than a crusaders its someone who wears the wrong hat and not following their exact same belief structure.  By hat, I'm talking about religion.  Its the stupidest thing to kill a person for, but its going on like you would not believe in Iraq, Iran, Afghanistan and Pakistan right now.  So no, the US has not killed a ton of innocent civilians deliberately.  Shiite and Sunnis on the other hand in Iraq have killed a shit load of innocent civilians in Iraq.
I remember the first article that claimed this (shortly after wikileaks posted it). It even directly linked the original cable... of course 90% of reddit was disgusted/outraged/angry. I read it multiple times and found nothing.  How the hell does this shit get perpetuated? This is one reason that "independent" journalists (bloggers or whatever) are worse then traditional journalists at even making the most basic attempts to source and verify their facts.
I live in Canada, and have lived in most of its urban centres and can confirm that this does happen. It's observation, therefor anecdotal, but it *does* happen.   Probably all black people do this.
Game reviewers put themselves in a much more difficult position with a 100-point scale than with, say, a 4- or 5-star system. When you believe a game is mediocre, it would in theory get around a 50. But then there's a whole 50 points or so that you're not giving to the game, and you have to explain it. Easier to just kick it up another 20 points so that you don't look so mean-spirited. With a 5-star system, meanwhile, giving a game only two or three stars is fine if the game isn't that great. People just don't perceive it the same way.  Is it proper? Of course not. The whole 100-point system is a hackneyed mistake. Metascores are the fucking devil. I'm just saying that the prevalence of ridiculously granular scoring is why verdicts get inflated.
Score!
[](/fu "Son of a bitch!")
Cute! I hope it doesn't melt.
Come to Ground Kontrol.
1. Because nearly all of my closer friends have it, and because it seems like it has a sizeable portion of the reddit community playing and I would wish to be a part of it. 2. In my position as a 16 year old living with his parents (who have fallen on some hard times), I don't have a source of funds to buy it. It's not that I don't have the money, but I'm more concerned for my family's well-being than buying video games. 3. I grew up on Perfect Dark, Goldeneye, and later, Half-Life 2. For funsies, what is/was yours, by the way?
Oh. It's a donkey.
Agreed, the federal government should force it's own current standard on gay marriage and civil unions onto the states, resulting in the overturning of all current state laws which allow them.  States should never be allowed to go against the way the feds do it, that shit is inhumane!!!  Woohooo!!!!
Return to Oz 
Yeah. I also think something is up here. Portal looks to have some significant upgrades to graphics, but there is some point where they need to make a Source 2 engine that brings it up to DX11 standards. Either way it'll be worth the wait.
Starve them. See how long that claim lasts.
You could try the [COINSGB](http://www.coinsgbforum.com/index.php?) forum if you don't have any luck here. Though I'm not certain it is a coin. When you look at the reserve it almost looks like it was cut down from something larger. Do you have any idea what it's made of?
doesn't sound too shitty...
Congratulations, I guess.
And blue/orange contrast strikes yet once again.
Thanks for the factoid. Any other gems?
Ugh--I came across that one yesterday.
My boyfriend actually gets sort of weirded out if I DO shave my legs.  His attitude is "But, there's supposed to be hair there, why would you remove it?"
i don't care if it was real or not, that was entertaining
GM Scott Pioli is the other ex-pat you're thinking of.  I wouldn't mind at all to see McDaniels here as an OC.  If the rumors are true Pioli wanted McDaniels as the HC in KC but Bowlen snuck in first.  No way would Pioli and Haley let McDaniels anywhere near drafts and personnel though.
Silver hit a fresh 30-year record of $30 per ounce entering 2011.  Investors in Silver need to know about Silver Saver.  Our mission is simply to put physical silver in the hands of Main Street America.  The best way to invest in silver now for the small to average size investor is through a service like this.
Morgan Freeman suffered [nerve damage to his arm](http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2009/12/04/morgan-freemans-hand-what_n_380717.html) and [underwent surgery](http://abcnews.go.com/CleanPrint/cleanprintproxy.aspx?1293839782084) after he was [seriously injured in a car accident](http://blog.zap2it.com/pop2it/2008/08/oscar-winning-a.html) in Mississippi back in 2008.  While he was never charged with a DUI, nor proven that he had been drinking, the other passenger in the car [alleged that Freeman was intoxicated](http://www.tmz.com/2009/02/25/morgan-freeman-sued-car-crash/) and later sued him.  The case was [settled out-of-court](http://uk.reuters.com/article/idUKTRE5A46E420091105) and the judge dismissed the lawsuit.    Now, I'm not a lawyer, but if you ask me it sounds like this woman was clearly trying to take advantage of a tragedy and extort money.  If Freeman had been intoxicated, surely the Mississippi police would have uncovered that information.  If you believe the rumors that the passenger was Freeman's mistress -- and his wife did file for divorce days after the accident -- it's more likely that they were arguing in the car, and that's what caused the accident.   He was just trying to drive her to the store...
Yeah I came here expecting mashed potatoes. Although a peacock drinking Billy Dee's favored malt beverage is awesome, I go away disappointed.
Alright, I'm in.
the background reminds me of a zoloft commercial.
That looks like a hipster!
This is a comment I expect from a 13-year-old girl. I am disappointed, sir.
well thought out post.  i'm going to come back with an answer when i have adequate time to answer it.  it's gonna be a long answer.
He had not reached majority, if the gender roles had been reversed he would have been in jail, not married.  You're right it is not pedophilia, but the term is used as such in pop culture and I didn't want to take to the time to qualify a label of ephebephilia or power structures.  It was lazy, my bad.
Well, since I heard on the radio that this service can be used here in OKC, I'd have to say that the program is running everywhere.  Otherwise, just call ahead and ask, so that you can line up a DD if needed.
My plan all along &gt;:)
Yeah, mostly the same here.  70 pounds lost since leaving home 3 and a half years ago.  Turns out it wasn't WoW, it was a crappy living enviroment with my parents.  Also, learned guitar, made a ton of friends I go out with, and started a relationship.  It's amazing people think you can't play casually.
How do these "VHS" work anyways? Is there an HDMI port somewhere? 
Thanks for the replies, I figured the slower download would be ok but I'm concerned about the upload. Bastards probably do this shitty upload speed on purpose so you'll stay with the more expensive option.
And this comes from your own experience?  Or some sort of study done?
that is a brilliant idea I am going to steal and make millions with
&gt;The meme aspect of bacon stems from the very fact that there are ridiculously few people that dislike bacon  Except, you know, two entire religions...
Not if you have a towel.
1) I want it because I want it.  Circular, but so is most reasons for wanting something that isn't life dependent.  I heard some of my friends talking about how fun it was and I downloaded the different TF2 Meet The videos.  Thought it was all pretty funny.  Watched the videos on Youtube and Reddit and I think it looks like an amazing game.  Nine actual different styles of playing means not getting bored.  2) Broke college student.  Wolfenstein ET is a free game at least.  3) Favorite childhood game was Super Mario Bros 3.  Except for the stupid 7th level.  Don't know why that was more difficult than the 8th world, but it happens.
coulda fooled me. 
Final Countdown
When it comes to pain in your dick you need to see a doctor, not fish for advice on reddit. 
yeah, the temperature is never right, it smells funny and the mattress is always too hard. Most uncomfortable experience ever.
I also disapprove of sexy kids.
I don't even care about the commentary that was an excellent game and the micro from iNcontroL was amazing.  It was an exciting game and I for one am glad it got casted.  No matter how bad the caster screws it up.
No, I got it.  But he still never mattered except as a deus ex for one fight.  The character never had valid motivations.
I just said "oh fuck off, I was passed out drunk and it obviously didn't work."  I don't care what friends think about the size of my dick. I don't care what girls think about the size of my dick. I don't think guys are getting laid in droves based on what girls have heard about their dick.
I've never seen this comment on reddit before. Never.
could be a hernia...could be something stuck in your bellybutton.
Yaay! Congratulations to you. A bowl in honor of you and your entwife-to-be. :D  edit: also happy new year etc etc
Have you ever tried to eat pizza with chopsticks?? Some things are better left unworldly.
You have inflated the value of those bills 10-fold. 
&gt;How does one make money by encouraging less use of vaccination?  If you have an interest in the companies that make the drugs to cure the diseases that the vaccines would normally prevent...
Better [SSD](http://www.ebuyer.com/product/225415) worth the extra £20.  An i5-2 lga1155 [mobo](http://www.amazon.co.uk/Asus-Motherboard-Chipset-Socket-Digital/dp/B004FNIL1S/ref=sr_1_11?ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1293839363&amp;sr=8-11) for the same price. The new i5-2500k cpu should cost ~£180. I think it's worth it to wait an extra week, pay an extra £20 for your cpu/mobo and get the sandy bridge architecture.
Furr
mostly college bars. Like I said, just turned 21 so haven't ventured out to the more reputable establishments. 
Thank you.
Yeah I will be there.
And they need to find a less-effeminate video spokesman who also doesn't talk to people like they're 6 year olds.  edit: Apparently, there's at least one effeminate down-talking video spokesman on reddit.
I would love nothing more. REDDIT MAKES DREAMS COME TRUE.....and gives birth to nightmares.....
Is this "evar" bullshit coming around again?
I own a business, and we have homeless issues in the summer as well.  They will come in and ask for water, be rude to employees and we even had one try to steal the tip jar off the counter.  They hang out and drink all day in a nearby park, and we call the cops on them as much as possible to 'haze' them away.  Stay at it, and always be really nice to the cops that do come.
Honestly... it's love hate for me. I grew up in FL and driving down there is like playing frogger. Trying to doge both slow blue-haired snow birds and stunt driving locals is quite a challenge. When i moved here i thought "ahh people drive much better here." But that quickly changed... especially after moving to boston. Lack of signals, no desire for speed at all (avg speed on most roads is 30mph-40mph max) coupled with stop signs that hide around corners and at the end of an icy hill. It's a wonder that the stretch of I-95 i lived in is considered more dangerous in FL than anywhere else in the country, and there are more traffic related deaths down there per capita. I guess people here drive MORE like you should, but they are still... *massholes*
I hate Candy DRM.
It's the champagne of PBR.
*My humps, my humps, my lovely lady humps*.
&gt;Beretta 92FS There's you're problem right there.  : ) Edit: /s/
As someone that was nearly homeless in January, fuck you for being an asshole.   As a law abiding citizen that wouldn't resort to criminal or other illegal activity even if homeless, fuck those animal bastards for shitting where they sleep. 
^ This guy wants some Minecraft.
I've never had this problem, but I have had an issue where after creating a shortcut to call/text/email that contact on one of the home screens it will link the wrong person to the shortcut. Selecting 'Person A' could result in having a shortcut labeled 'Person A' with that person's picture, but when call/text is selected it will send to 'Person Q's phone number!  A little strange...
http://i.imgur.com/WC7Qc.jpgs  And i forgot the picture. 
&gt;30,000 thousand people since 2006!  Thirty thousand thousand?  Damn.  Last night I was watching Snakes on a Plane, and one of the pilots shouted out that he was opening the EAP panel... the Entry Access Panel panel.
Ghandi was a British civil rights leader.
Nope just you.
I approve of this.
I think the land lord would find a place for the old fridge in another apartment suite and you could sell the new fridge to the next tennant when you leave.  Youl wouldn't make all of your money back from the sale.  But for me, it would be worth it not to have a crappy fridge.  But then again I'm kinda picky like that
OOoooooh I want!
I opened yours while I was playing with OP's and now I have magic!  Thankyou!
Indeed, it wasn't handled right by either of them. 
[http://instantrimshot.com](http://instantrimshot.com/classic/?sound=rimshot)
See, this is another sign of your tragic space dementia, all paranoid and crotchety. Breaks the heart.
Chicago here! Happy New Year everybody!
You have to play 6 and 7 man.
[Youtube Link / Mirror](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oYSVTv7btqg#t=2m14s)
&gt;YOU: (scrolls to top, rereads post's title, thinks to himself *what a retard..*)  FTFY  Your counter-argument to his first comment was something that came from the equivalent of a pissed-off pre-teen. He responded accordingly. Then you made a broad assumption that he was arguing that: &gt;...angry drivers are the only problem with the world.  I simply used your tactics to show you how retarded you sound.  YOU: (too retarded to comprehend)
Does that mean everyone should only own muskets or whatever?  I know I know, its a troll of a question.  But it's interesting that you say it could include everything up to and including nuclear weapons.
That's because corporate news is a Pravda style propaganda complex. Your 1984 reference is very apt. 92% of Afghans aren't even aware that 9/11 happened. They just think they are resisting another random foreign occupier.
